Vingt-troisième séance plénière
3 novembre 1987, à 10 h 20  Président : M. PUTZEYS ALVAREZ (Guatemala)  puis : M. PEIN (Autriche)  Twenty-third plenary meeting
(1) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  Distinguished delegates, we are about to begin our work today which, as you  know, will consist of a special debate on literacy education (item 16.7 of the  agenda). I give the floor first to the Director-General.
2.1 Le DIRECTEUR GENERAL :  Monsieur le Président de la Conférence générale, Mesdames, Messieurs  les délégués, le theme de votre débat spécial correspond à une des missions  essentielles de l'Unesco puisque son Acte constitutif assigne à notre Organisa-  tion la responsabilité d'imprimer une impulsion vigoureuse 6 l'éducation popu-  laire et à la diffusion de la culture.
2.2 L'alphabétisation, qui est au coeur de toute éducation populaire dans  les sociétés modernes, a été une préoccupation constante de l'Unesco depuis sa  création. Elle a fait l'objet de plusieurs résolutions de la Conférence générale,  dont je rappellerai quelques-unes, ainsi que de nombreuses initiatives, en par-  ticulier ces dernières années. Les débats qui ont eu lieu au cours de cette ses-  sion de la Conférence générale au sein de la Commission II ont montré l'impor-  tance accrue que lui accordent les Etats membres. Deux documents soumis à cette  session de la Conférence générale portent sur cette question, le document 24 C/67  concernant l'Année internationale de l'alphabétisation et le document 24 C/78  qui contient des indications sur un plan d'action visant 2 éliminer l'analphabé-  tisme d'ici à l'an 2000. Le débat qui a lieu aujourd'hui peut donc jouer un rôle  essentiel dans l'orientation de l'action de l'Unesco, ainsi que dans la stimula-  tion des efforts des Etats membres en vue d'éliminer l'analphabétisme dans les  délais les plus brefs. L'élimination de l'analphabétisme est en effet à la fois  une obligation morale et un impératif du développement.
2.3 Voyons comment la situation se présente actuellement. Les efforts qui  ont été déployés au cours des dernières décennies ont permis d'obtenir des  résultats remarquables. Les. taux d'analphabétisme ont baissé de façon notable,  mais les statistiques dont nous disposons montrent qu'en 1985, il y avait encore
889 millions d'analphabètes dans le monde. L'Asie, le continent le plus fortement  peuplé, en compte à elle seule les deux tiers, soit quelque 666 millions.  L'Afrique vient en deuxième position avec 162 millions d'analphabètes, mais avec  un taux d'analphabétisme plus élevé puisque celui-ci est de 54 % alors qu'il  n'est que de 36,8 % en Asie. La région de l'Amérique latine et des Caraïbes est,  parmi les régions du monde en développement, celle qui compte le nombre le moins  élevé d'adultes analphabètes, soit 44 millions, et un taux d'analphabétisme de
17,3 %. Par ailleurs, il y a dans les pays en développement plus de 100 millions  d'enfants de 6 à 11 ans qui ne sont pas scolarisés et qui viendront grossir,  dans les années à venir, les rangs des adultes analphabètes. I1 convient de sou-  ligner aussi que 60 % des analphabètes sont dek femmes et que la majeure partie  des analphabètes vivent en milieu rural et dans les banlieues pauvres des grandes  agglomérations urbaines. L'analphabétisme n'épargne du reste aucune région. Si  son impact est plus sensible dans le tiers monde, il n'est pas absent des pays  industriels OU l'analphabétisme fonctionnel ou l'illettrisme sont devenus  préoccupants.
2.4 Si l'on examine l'évolution de la situation dans le monde entre 1970 et
1985, c'est-à-dire, en somme, au cours des 15 dernières années, on constate  l'existence de tendances à première vue contradictoires. En effet, pendant cette  période, le nombre absolu d'analphabètes a continué d'augmenter, alors que le  taux d'analphabétisme dans la population adulte déclinait progressivement. Cela  s'explique par l'évolution démographique. La population adulte s'est accrue en  effet pendant les 15 années en question de quelque 800 millions d'individus, dont
100 millions seulement demeurent analphabètes. Les 700 autres millions, ayant  bénéficié d'un enseignement scolaire, échappent ainsi à l'analphabétisme. L'aug-  mentation considérable du nombre des alphabetes et la baisse du taux d'analpha-  bétisme sont la preuve incontestable que les efforts déployés par les Etats  membres dans le domaine de l'éducation portent leurs fruits.
2.5 I1 faut reconnaître cependant que ces progrès sont désespérément lents  si l'on se réfere à la tâche à accomplir. Au rythme actuel des scolarisations,  le problème de l'analphabétisme ne sera pas résolu avant la deuxième moitié du  XXIe siècle et l'objectif qui a été fixé par la Conference générale, à savoir  l'élimination de l'analphabétisme d'ici à l'an 2000, ne sera pas atteint. La  persistance de cet analphabétisme à grande échelle est, vous le savez, un  obstacle majeur au développement et à la prise en main par des millions d'hommes  et de femmes de leur propre destin. Cette persistance compromet la lutte contre  la pauvreté, la suppression des inégalités et l'espoir de voir s'établir des  relations plus justes et plus équitables entre les individus comme entre les  nations.
2.6 C'est pour attirer l'attention de la communauté internationale sur  l'importance majeure de l'enjeu que constitue l'alphabétisation pour le dévelop-  pement et pour le progrès des sociétés que la Conférence générale, a sa vingt-  troisième session, a adopte une serie de resolutions relatives a l'alphabétisa-  tion. Dans la première d'entre elles, la résolution 2.2, la Conférence générale  lance "un appel a l'Assemblée générale des Nations Unies pour qu'elle proclame  une Année internationale de l'alphabétisation, dont la célébration contribuera a  une plus grande compréhension par l'opinion publique mondiale des différents  aspects du problème de l'analphabétisme et a l'intensification des efforts d'al-  phabétisation et de développement de l'éducation, et préparera la base d'une  stratégie globale visant à l'élimination de l'analphabétisme" d'ici a l'an 2000.  Vous aurez noté, 5 la lecture du document 24 C/67, que l'assemblée générale a  répondu positivement 5 l'appel de la Conférence générale ; je dirai même qu'elle  y a répondu avec enthousiasme. Il est à peu près acquis que dans les semaines  qui viennent, à sa quarante-deuxième session, l'Assemblée générale proclamera  l'année 1990 Année internationale de l'alphabétisation.
2.7 Une seconde résolution, la résolution 2.8 qui traite de l'alphabétisa-  tion des femmes, "invite les gouvernements qui ne l'auraient pas encore fait a  adopter des programmes visant a éliminer l'analphabétisme d'ici a la fin du  siècle et a prendre a cet effet les mesures novatrices propres a éliminer  l'analphabétisme dans la population féminine, où il est le plus répandu". Je  voudrais rappeler ce que je viens de dire a l'instant même, a savoir que 60 %  des analphabètes dans le monde sont des femmes.
2.8 La troisième resolution concernant l'alphabétisation, la résolution 4.6,  demande que, dans le cadre de l'élaboration du troisième Plan a moyen terme de  l'Unesco, soit préparé un plan d'action destiné a aider les Etats membres de  toutes les régions du monde a éliminer l'analphabétisme d'ici a l'an 2000. Ces  trois résolutions constituent bien sûr un tout.
2.9 L'Année internationale de l'alphabétisation doit être, je le rappelle,  l'occasion de sensibiliser les responsables a tous les niveaux et l'ensemble des  populations aux méfaits de l'analphabétisme ; elle doit contribuer également a  mobiliser toutes les énergies de façon que puisse être entreprise au cours de la  décennie qui nous separe de la fin de ce siècle, une action vigoureuse propre 2  éliminer définitivement l'analphabétisme. A cet égard, je me dois de souligner  que pareille entreprise représente pour notre Organisation un engagement impor-  tant et nouveau, qui ne doit pas être limité a elle seule et qu'elle ne saurait  tenir seule. Tous les Etats membres sont concernes. Par les résolutions qu'ils  adoptent, ils s'engagent collectivement et individuellement a se mobiliser, a  redoubler d'efforts pour éliminer l'analphabétisme et assurer a tous l'exercice  effectif du droit 8 l'éducation. I1 faut bien dire que ces initiatives en faveur  de l'alphabétisation, quelles que soient l'imagination et l'énergie que le  Secrétariat leur consacrera, quelles que soient l'efficacité du soutien des  organisations non gouvernementales et leur participation a l'action, auront bien  peu d'effet sans la volonté politique des gouvernements des pays intéressés.  Reconnaître la primauté de la responsabilité nationale, ce n'est évidemment pas  dégager la communauté internationale, en général, et l'Unesco, en particulier,  des obligations importantes et essentielles qui leur incombent dans un tel effort  visant a créer un monde alphabète avant la fin du siècle. C'est simplement  admettre que le rôle de l'Unesco est un rôle de stimulation, de coordination,  d'aide aussi, les principaux acteurs de cette entreprise historique étant les  gouvernements et les peuples des Etats membres.
2.10 J'ai rappelé tout à l'heure que dès les premières années de sa création,  l'Unesco s'est engagée dans une action vigoureuse d'encouragement et d'appui a  ses Etats membres en vue de l'élimination de l'analphabétisme. Cette action est  passée par plusieurs étapes. Je signalerai ici l'action en cours qui a démarré  dans les premières années de la décennie 1980 avec le lancement, sur la base de  la stratégie proposée par l'Unesco, de vastes projets majeurs d'élimination de  l'analphabétisme dans toutes les régions du monde. Ces projets étaient fondés  sur une double stratégie dont le premier element consistait à généraliser l'en-  seignement primaire en vue de tarir l'analphabétisme à la source.
2.11 La généralisation de l'enseignement primaire, il faut le dire, si elle  n'est pas accompagnée d'une rénovation de cet enseignement et de certaines  mesures sociales, ne saurait avoir les effets escomptés. En effet, on estime que  dans certains pays, près de 30 % des enfants qui entrent à l'école primaire  quittent l'école prématurément et retombent dans l'analphabétisme. I1 est donc  essentiel, tout en généralisant l'enseignement primaire, de rénover cet ensei-  gnement, afin de diminuer les déperditions, qui sont d'ailleurs source de  dépenses accrues étant donné que les enfants qui redoublent ou triplent leur  scolarité primaire occupent des places que pourraient occuper d'autres enfants  non scolarisés.
2.12 Cependant, à l'effort visant à ia généralisation de l'enseignement pri-  maire pour tarir l'analphabétisme à la source, doit s'ajouter un autre effort  dont l'objectif est de généraliser l'alphabétisation des adultes. Cette alphabé-  tisation des adultes doit être accompagnée elle aussi par des activités ouvrant  aux communautés qui en bénéficient des possibilités d'améliorer leurs conditions  d'existence. En d'autres termes, il ne s'agit pas seulement d'apprendre à lire  et à écrire aux adultes mais de leur donner aussi les moyens de combattre la  pauvreté par l'accroissement de leurs capacités productives, de faire face aux  problèmes sanitaires et, bien sûr, d'améliorer leur habitat.
2.13 Le premier projet majeur qui a été lancé au début des années 80 a été  le Projet majeur dans le domaine de l'éducation en Amérique latine et dans les  Caraïbes (PROMEDLAC) qui est devenu opérationnel depuis plusieurs années et dont  le Comité régional se réunit périodiquement. Ensuite, il y a le Programme régio-  nal d'élimination de l'analphabétisme en Afrique et, enfin, un Programme simi-  laire pour l'Asie et le Pacifique qui fonctionne depuis 1986 et que l'on déSigne  par le sigle APPEAL. Une résolution approuvée par la Commission II, qui en  recommande l'adoption à la plénière, soulignera du reste toute l'importance de  ce programme. Un autre programme est en cours de préparation actuellement pour  la région des Etats arabes. J'ajouterai, à ce propos, qu'en ce qui concerne la  région des Etats arabes, une stratégie a 6th définie par 1'ALECSO elle-même,  dont l'objectif va dans le même sens que les objectifs de l'Unesco. Ces pro-  grammes constitueront sans doute la base du Plan d'action qui sera élaboré dans  le cadre de la préparation du troisième Plan à moyen terme. En effet, les struc-  tures existent ; une stratégie a été adoptée par les Etats membres ; aussi  faudra-t-il, dans le cadre du troisième Plan à moyen terme, réfléchir aux moyens  d'accentuer l'effort afin de permettre aux différents projets majeurs de produire  pleinement leurs effets et de parvenir 6 éliminer l'analphabétisme d'ici à la  fin de ce siècle.
2.14 Permettez-moi maintenant de revenir quelques instants sur l'Année  internationale de l'alphabétisation. Si nous voulons que cette Année se traduise  par des résultats concrets, il faut que, dès à présent, les Etats membres com-  mencent a mettre au point les actions qui permettront d'obtenir les résultats  voulus. Peut-être conviendrait-il en premier lieu de créer dans chaque Etat  membre un comité national charge de la célébration de l'Année. A côté de ces  comités nationaux, je verrais même des comités locaux, provinciaux ou municipaux,  qui permettraient de faire descendre ia réflexion et l'action au niveau de la  base, c'est-à-dire au niveau des populations concernées. Toutefois, ces comités  nationaux ne devraient pas, à mon avis, comprendre uniquement des personnalités  agissant dans le domaine de l'éducation. 11s devraient également compter dans  leurs rangs des spécialistes appartenant à tous les secteurs d'activité qui  peuvent avoir de l'influence sur le processus d'élimination de l'analphabétisme,  bien entendu, mais aussi sur les actions propres à permettre aux populations, en  même temps que d'être alphabétisées, de maîtriser les connaissances ou le  savoir-faire nécessaires pour contribuer à la solution de leurs propres problèmes  et améliorer leurs conditions d'existence.
2.15 Je suis heureux de pouvoir signaler aussi qu'un certain nombre d'orga-  nisations non gouvernementales ont déjà entamé des préparatifs en vue de leur  participation à l'Année internationale de l'alphabétisation. Ainsi, le Conseil  international d'éducation des adultes a déjà constitué une équipe de travail  chargée de préparer l'Année. Cette équipe s'est réunie pour la première fois au  début de ce mois. L'Union internationale des étudiants a, pour sa part, entrepris  à l'échelle mondiale une étude destinée à définir des mesures en vue de dévelop-  per et d'améliorer la participation des étudiants à l'action d'alphabétisation.  Le Comité de coordination du service volontaire international se propose d'éta-  blir un guide du bénévolat sur les activités d'alphabétisation. La Consultation  collective des ONG sur l'alphabétisation, organisée chaque année par l'Unesco,  sert désormais de cadre à des travaux de préparation de l'Année internationale  de l'alphabétisation. Pour sa part, le Secrétariat a entrepris des travaux pré-  paratoires qui Sont mentionnés dans le document 24 C/67 dans lequel je propose,  par ailleurs, des mesures qui pourraient être prises dans les mois à venir afin  de soutenir l'action menée au niveau national. Bref, l'Année internationale de  l'alphabétisation sera ce que nous en ferons tous ensemble par notre réflexion,  notre imagination et nos efforts.
2.16 La question a été soulevée au sein de la Commission II, et ailleurs, de  savoir s'il était vraiment possible d'éliminer l'analphabétisme dans les quelques  années qui nous séparent de la fin du siècle. C'est une question pertinente.  Sans aucun doute, le but que s'est fixé la communauté internationale dans la  résolution 4.6 est aussi ambitieux qu'exigeant. Nous l'avons dit, la lutte contre  l'anaphalbétisme s'alourdit d'une étroite interrelation avec la pauvreté. L'al-  phabétisation est aussi un cheminement vers la justice, l'équité, le développe-  ment et, enfin, une lutte contre la pauvreté. Les difficultés ne manqueront pas,  mais le but fixé est essentiel.
2.17 I1 y a des raisons d'espoir aussi bien que des hésitations devant les  tâches à accomplir. Bien des pays pauvres en ressources naturelles et financières  ont prouve que par leur détermination, par l'imagination et grâce au dévouement  de leurs responsables et des secteurs les plus importants de la population, ils  pouvaient obtenir, dans le domaine de l'alphabétisation, des résultats que des  pays plus dotes en ressources n'obtiennent pas. L'objectif d'un plan d'action,  c'est donc de créer dans les Etats membres une dynamique vigoureuse, résolument  tournée vers l'élimination de l'analphabétisme dans les délais les plus brefs.  Mais les efforts doivent être soutenus aussi, je le repete, par un ferme engage-  ment politique et par une mobilisation énergique des ressources et des volontés.  La communauté internationale, quant à elle, a pour obligation de poursuivre,  avec des ressources accrues, avec une volonté résolue, avec l'énergie et l'in-  telligence qu'elle peut rassembler, cette mission historique afin de parvenir à  ce que d'ici à la fin du siècle le monde entier, je le répète, soit alphabétisé.  Si nous nous unissons dans cette entreprise, je suis convaincu que les résultats  pourront être à la mesure de nos espoirs.
2.18 En dernier lieu, j'aimerais saisir cette occasion pour saluer chaleu-  reusement les millions d'hommes et de femmes qui, dans le monde, consacrent leur  vie au développement de l'éducation et à l'alphabétisation. Je pense aux ensei-  gnants des écoles primaires, à ceux des centres d'alphabétisation, aussi bien  qu'à ces milliers d'hommes et de femmes de bonne volonté, de tous âges et de  tous horizons, qui soutiennent de mille et une façons cette grande oeuvre qu'est  la création d'un monde sans analphabétisme. Souvent, ils font un travail anonyme  dans des régions lointaines, dans des situations difficiles et avec des res-  sources limitées mais, en retour, ils ont la satisfaction personnelle de contri-  buer à l'amélioration de l'existence de leurs concitoyens et peut-être aussi, ce  faisant, de contribuer à l'instauration d'un monde plus juste et plus solidaire.  J'espère fermement que l'Année internationale de l'alphabétisation sera une  grande cause dans leur existence et leur permettra de constater qu'ils n'agissent  pas seuls ou isolement et qu'ils appartiennent à l'un des plus grands mouvements  humanistes de notre époque. Je vous remercie.
(3.1) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  education.  I thank the Director-General for introducing the special debate on literacy
(3.2) I should like to inform the distinguished delegates that at 12 noon the  distinguished Vice-president from Austria will chair the debate.
(3.3) I also wish to remind you that in document 24 G/INF.16, on the organization  of the special debate, the General Committee decided that statements should be  limited to ten minutes. I request delegates to comply with that decision in the  common interest.
(3.4) I invite the delegate of France from Group I to take the floor.
4.1 M. SIRINELLI (France) :  Monsieur le President, vous me permettrez d'abord, au nom de la déléga-  tion française, d'apporter notre tribut d'éloges à M. Iba Der Thiam et à M. Andri  Isaksson pour le très remarquable rapport qu'ils ont établi sur l'oeuvre d'al-
71 9    phabétisation de l'Unesco. Au-delà des auteurs, que je félicite vivement, je ne  puis manquer de remercier M. M'Bow, dont chacun connaît l'attachement ancien, et  pour ainsi dire viscéral, à la solution du problème de l'analphabétisme. Ce rap-  port, qui est d'une grande richesse, est dès maintenant et sera longtemps pour  tous le document de référence dans ce domaine. I1 retrace d'abord avec précision,  et depuis ses débuts, les étapes des efforts que l'Organisation a déployés en  cette matière. I1 nous livre ensuite une sorte de bilan de ses activités, dresse  un constat des résultats et des difficultés rencontrées et présente enfin des  suggestions pour de nouvelles stratégies.
4.2 Le rappel historique contenu dans le rapport nous apprend que la ques-  tion de l'alphabétisation a été évoquée dès la première session de la Conférence  générale et qu'elle est en quelque sorte consubstantielle 6 la mission de  l'Unesco. Elle était évoquée comme il convenait qu'elle le fût, c'est-à-dire non  point comme un problème de rencontre, né des requêtes d'un pays ou de la solli-  citude d'un autre, mais comme une obligation morale qui s'imposait aux Etats  membres au même titre que le respect des droits de l'homme et ce n'est pas un  hasard si la Déclaration universelle des droits de l'homme reconnaissait dès
1948 le droit 6 l'éducation. I1 n'est pas inutile de le rappeler car si d'autres  justifications - et notamment l'intérêt du développement - sont admissibles et  raisonnables, la reconnaissance de ce droit de l'individu à l'épanouissement nous  impose à elle seule, indépendamment et au-dessus de toute autre considération,  fût-elle legitime et louable, le devoir de solidarité. L'alphabétisation est,  dès lors, dans son principe, oeuvre commune et elle est le fondement même de  l'universalité car elle est une des clés de l'accès à l'universel. La leçon que  nous donne 6 cet égard le rappel de ces premières années reste aujourd'hui plus  que jamais valable. Quelle que soit la difficulté de l'entreprise, l'opinion  publique est et sera fondée à juger l'Unesco sur les résultats obtenus dans ce  domaine, précisément parce que, en tant qu'institution du système des Nations  Unies, c'est à elle que revient une responsabilité éminente dans la mise en  oeuvre de la Declaration universelle des droits de l'homme. N'en doutons pas,  plus encore que ia plus populaire et ia plus justifiée des campagnes de sauve-  garde du patrimoine, c'est la réussite de la campagne d'alphabétisation qui  pourrait donner son plus grand éclat à l'image de l'Organisation.
4.3 En second lieu, le bilan qu'établissent les auteurs du rapport est évi-  demment inférieur aux espoirs que nourrissaient les fondateurs de l'Unesco.  Certes, en pourcentage, l'analphabétisme regresse de façon sensible mais, en  valeur absolue, à cause notamment de l'accroissement démographique, il augmente  à peu près dans les mêmes proportions. Cette course inégale contre le temps peut  avoir quelque chose de désespérant mais la lassitude serait notre pire ennemie.  Cependant, i l  convient sans doute pour la combattre de se rappeler qu'à toutes  les étapes de leur développement, les communautés nationales ont été obligées de  reconquérir pied 6 pied les espaces perdus dans ce domaine. Après tous les con-  flits, tous ies déplacements massifs de population, toutes ies régressions de  l'éducation, il a fallu rebâtir des écoles et obliger une jeunesse nouvelle à en  prendre le chemin. L'histoire nous rapporte l'exemple des Athéniens : ayant dû  évacuer leur ville devant l'invasion perse, la première mesure qu'ils prirent,  sur le territoire oh ils s'étaient réfugiés, fut de rétablir l'enseignement pour  leurs enfants, avant même toute défense contre l'ennemi immédiat, car c'était  une précaution à l'égard de l'avenir qu'ils prenaient pour ne pas interrompre la  chaîne de l'enseignement. Voilà un exemple que nous devons garder à l'esprit. I1  montre que c'est assurément avant tout de la volonté des Etats que peuvent  naître les véritables progrès. Eux seuls peuvent motiver leur population, mettre  en oeuvre les programmes, et l'organisation ne saurait se substituer à eux. Mais  i l  est de son devoir de les appuyer de son autorité morale et, si elle inscrit  dans ses priorités essentielles la lutte contre l'analphabétisme, elle donne  aussitôt aux Etats membres le sentiment que, à l'intérieur de leur propre  liberté, ils sont attelés à une tâche qui concerne la communauté mondiale.
4.4 Mais, au-delà de la volonté propre des Etats, qui est le ressort déter-  minant dans cette aventure, nous avons peut-être une autre raison d'espérer. En  effet, le rapport passe en revue les différentes activités qui ont tendu à pro-  mouvoir l'alphabétisation. Certes, elles n'ont pas toujours donné les résultats  escomptes. Mais on est frappe par une certaine progression dans la prise de  conscience qui préside à cette entreprise. Parties d'une sorte d'idéologie des  lumières qui escomptait, pour ainsi dire, un développement linéaire, naturel et  autonome du savoir, les campagnes d'alphabétisation ont pris un tout autre  caractère. On sait fort bien maintenant que, comme toute autre activité sociale,  celle-ci ne saurait être dissociée de son contexte : alphabétisation fonction-  nelle, éducation globale, éducation non formelle, développement intégré, complé-  mentarité sont autant de concepts, autant de stratégies, dont l'énumération  pourrait renforcer l'impression d'incertitude et d'échec s'il ne s'agissait, au  contraire, de tentatives successives qui, dans une continuité en profondeur,  s'affinent et se corrigent dans les tâtonnements de l'expérience.
4.5 C'est précisément là que l'Unesco joue et doit jouer pleinement son  rôle. Laboratoire d'idées, lieu d'échanges, elle est là pour éclairer s'ils le  souhaitent l'action des Etats membres, pour servir de carrefour en vue de  l'échange d'informations sur les méthodes et les résultats. Je me suis, comme  tout un chacun, réjoui de voir la Commission II donner une priorité à l'alphabé-  tisation, d'entendre que le BIE allait s'occuper plus particulièrement de cette  question, et, enfin, d'apprendre que le prochain Plan à moyen terme serait ouvert  par une Année internationale de l'alphabétisation qui nous permettra sans doute  de mobiliser les organisations non gouvernementales. Ainsi sera affirmée une des  lignes de force de nos prochains efforts. La délégation française souhaite que  ce grand dessein permette une mobilisation durable et efficace de toutes les  volontés. Je vous remercie, Monsieur le Président.
(5) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  floor to the delegate of the Federal Republic of Germany.  I thank the distinguished delegate of France for his statement. I give the
6.1 Mr SCHOFTHALER (Federal Republic of Germany):  Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, the delegation of the Federal  Republic of Germany is pleased that our proposal to hold a one-day plenary  session focusing on a priority field of action was accepted and that the subject  of the session is literacy.
6.2 Our delegation appreciates the new and innovative trends described in  the Report of the Director-General on the Draft Programme for International  Literacy Year. In particular, the identification of issues of critical importance  to the progress of literacy is considered a major step towards further  strengthening the efficiency of the Organization's activities in this field.  Objective (vi) proposed for International Literacy Year is: 'using ILY for  launching the plan of action for the eradication of illiteracy by the year 2000  and for addressing issues of critical importance to the progress of literacy such  as reducing primary-school drop-out and establishing post-literacy programmes to  prevent relapse into illiteracy'. Our delegation is convinced that these innova-  tive trends fully comply with the Organization's mandate as stated in Article I,  paragraph 2(b) , to the effect that to realize its 'purpose the Organization will  ... give fresh impulse to popular education and to the spread of culture'.
6.3 Some of the delegates may share the feelings of a journalist of the  Brazilian daily newspaper O Globo: towards the end of Unesco's 'Europe region  workshop of specialists on the prevention of functional illiteracy and the  integration of youth into the world of work', held from 1 to 5 December 1986 .at  the Unesco Institute for Education, Hamburg, the journalist phoned from Rio de  Janeiro and asked: 'Did I really understand correctly the news that you in  industrialized countries are dealing with the problems of illiteracy'. I can  assure you that many journalists in our country felt puzzled in a similar way  when confronted with the results of this meeting, which was the first of its kind  in Unesco's Europe region. The media in our country reacted in a very positive  manner. They became more and more interested, and they contributed effectively to  our task of alerting public opinion to the problems of illiteracy in industrial-  ized as well as in developing countries. The Gernan National Commission for  Unesco has compiled a press book on the Hamburg workshop. Nearly all the press  cuttings indicate that this important activity of Unesco has contributed  remarkably to improving its prestige in our country.
6.4 The struggle against illiteracy has become an area of common concern  among industrialized as well as developing countries, thus underlining the  importance of objectives (iii) and (iv) proposed for ILY, namely: 'increasing  popular participation, within and among countries, in efforts to combat  illiteracy ...I and 'increasing co-operation and solidarity among Member States in  the struggle against illiteracy'. There are, of course, marked differences  between industrialized and developing countries. In most industrialized countries  the number of those having never been trained in reading, writing and numeracy is  too small for it to be a matter of educational statistics. There are, however,  tendencies to relapse into what Unesco has called 'functional illiteracy' in the  Federal Republic of Germany as well as in many other inüustrialized countries.  These tendencies were brought to the attention of our governments only some years  ago, with considerable assistance from Unesco. The danger of relapse into  functional illiteracy should be taken very seriously from our point of view; this  issue could constitute a focal point of reflection for the world community, thus  encouraging increasing co-operation and solidarity among Member States iri the  struggle against illiteracy.
6.5 Until the end of the 1970s, the problem of adult illiteracy had not been  brought to the attention of public opinion in most industrialized countries,  including our own. The situation changed rapidly after the Federal Ministry of  Education and Science, alarmed by adult educators, carried out the first  scientific study on illiteracy in the Federal Republic of Germany in 1979. The  findings were that there is a significant but unknown number of fully schooled  adults in our country who have virtually lost their ability to read and write.  Action was taken immediately : the government encouraged the existing adult  education centres to offer courses in reading and writing. Today, such courses  are offered by over 300 such centres, with about 8,000 adults enrolled. This  development had a catalytic role for German organizations and agencies involved  in development co-operation: literacy had been considered, until the 1970s as a  particular aspect of qualification which would remain, successfully inculcated.
6.6 The danger of the relapse into illiteracy of neo-literates in developing  countries was brought to the attention of these agencies at the same time as we  became aware that this fate could be the fate of our own children as well. Today,  development co-operation is seen by the authorities of our country as based on  both literacy and post-literacy.
6.7 It was also in 1980 that our government started subsidizing an inter-  regional project of the Unesco Institute for Education, Hamburg, on research and  orientation in the fielã of post-literacy. Under this project, research and  orientation seminars were held in all of Unesco's regions, involving key  personnel in the field of literacy from more than 80 countries. In 1987, a new  phase of this project has started in order to contribute as efficiently as  possible to the struggle against illiteracy. From 9 to 21 November 1987, in  Hamburg, UIE will be assembling key personnel from 24 countries from all of  Unesco's regions, each represented by a decision-maker and a senior specialist in  the field of literacy. The participants are expected to bring a diagnosis of  literacy issues of their respective countries to Hamburg and to develop national  plans of action äuring the seminar.
6.8 Our delegation appreciates that Unesco will include the activities of  the Unesco Institute for Education in the Plan of Action for the Eradication of  Illiteracy by the Year 2000 to be launched during International Literacy Year.  The regional and situation-specific approach of Unesco Institute of Education  seems to fit in very well with the development of Unesco's literacy work in  general, involving the launching of regional projects first in Latin America and  the Caribbean, then in Africa and Asia and the Pacific, and from now on also in  the Arab countries.
6.9 We listened carefully to the comments made by many other delegations in  Commission II of this General Conference on the nature of Unesco's Plan for the  Eradication of Illiteracy by the Year 2000: some delegations called this a dream  that will never come true; most delegations, however, felt that a new take-off is  absolutely essential, and that the dream should lead to at least significant  progress by the year 2000. Pursuing a dream does not necessarily preclude  realistic policies.
6.10 Mr President, let me conclude by outlining several ways in which the  Federal Republic of Germany could contribute to international co-operation in  this field.
6.11 You have got the most recent issue of 'Prospects', No. 62, which is an  open file on 'Illiteracy in industrialized countries'. In this issue you will  find an article on literacy, adult literacy and methods and materials in the  Federal Republic of Germany; and there are many other fields apart from methods  and materials - such as library research and library media, the aspect of  promoting reading and writing proficiency through the media, literacy strategies  for NGOs and development co-operation - in which institutions and organizations  in the Federal Republic of Germany are interested in strengthening co-operation  with other countries of the world and are willing to do so.
6.12 Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, it is not the time to paint an  optimistic picture of the situation of literacy in the world community. With the  absolute number of illiterates still increasing, an6 the phenomenon of relapse  posing the nightmare of a second-order illiteracy, both action and reflection are  needed. Several delegations have expressed their view during this General  Conference that, whatever we do in our struggle against illiteracy, it will not  be sufficient. The message I wish to communicate to you is that, in such a  desperate situation, growing awareness of problems at home must not prevent you  from being motivated in the cause of international co-operation and solidarity.  In the field of literacy, I am convinced, the contrary rather is true. Thank you  Mr President.
(7) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I give the floor to the delegate of Portugal.  I thank the delegate of the Federal Republic of Germany for his statement.
8.1 M. SEABRA (Portugal) :  Monsieur le Président, Messieurs les délégués, le débat spécial que la  Conférence générale consacre aujourd'hui à la problématique de l'alphabétisation  se justifie pleinement. I1 s'agit, en effet, de ce qu'on pourrait appeler la  priorité des priorités parmi les grands ojectifs assignés à l'Unesco, a un moment  historique ob elle doit trouver un nouveau souffle en procédant à des réformes  de fond propres à rétablir sa crédibilité dans les opinions publiques nationales  et internationales. A cet effet, il lui faut faire la démonstration de son rôle  irremplaçable, notamment dans la lutte contre l'un des fléaux qui continue à  sévir sur notre planète, malgré les progrès scientifiques et techniques et les  transformations socio-économiques en cours, d'ailleurs tres inégalement répar-  ties : je veux parler de l'analphabétisme, qui touche plus d'un quart de la  population mondiale de 15 ans et plus - 889 millions de personnes en 1985 -,  alors que la scolarisation des enfants d'âge scolaire demeure très insuffisante,  surtout dans les pays en développement - 107 millions d'enfants ayant entre 11  et 14 ans ne sont pas scolarisés, comme l'attestent les statistiques de notre  Organisation.
8.2 A sa dernière session, tenue à Sofia en 1985, la Conférence générale a  été bien inspirée de voter deux résolutions qui ont été une sorte de signal  d'alarme devant la gravité de la situation et la nécessité urgente pour l'Unesco  d'assumer ses responsabilités dans ce domaine. En décidant de proposer à l'Assem-  blée générale des Nations Unies la proclamation d'une Année internationale de  l'alphabétisation et d'élaborer en même temps un Plan d'action pour éliminer  l'analphabétisme d'ici à l'an 2000, les délégués des Etats membres ont fait  preuve d'une conscience aiguë du caractère pressant d'une mobilisation mondiale  autour de cette question décisive. Le Conseil exécutif a, d'autre part, pris lui  aussi ses responsabilités en décidant de confier à deux de ses membres,  MM. Isaksson et Thiam, la réalisation, pendant l'exercice 1986-1987, d'une etude  en profondeur sur l'oeuvre d'alphabétisation de l'Unesco, qui dresse un bilan de  son action passée et ébauche des stratégies possibles en vue d'une action future.
8.3 L'Unesco peut se prévaloir, il est vrai, d'avoir obtenu quelques résul-  tats positifs au cours des quarante ans de lutte contre l'analphabétisme qui se  Sont écoulés depuis que Julian Huxley, son premier Directeur général, déclarait  que I'.. . Tant que la moitié des habitants du monde seront privés de cette liberte  élémentaire qui consiste à pouvoir lire et écrire, nous n'aurons pas pleinement  atteint l'idéal d'unité et de justice universelles que les Nations Unies se sont  engagées à poursuivre". Mais le fait que l'on parle maintenant non pas de la  moitié mais de plus d'un quart de la population du monde encore à alphabétiser,  alors même qu'il faut éviter que de nouvelles générations viennent grossir les  masses d'illettrés avec de nouvelles formes d'analphabétisme - l'analphabétisme  de retour, l'analphabétisme fonctionnel -, donne raison aux auteurs de l'étude  en profondeur précédemment citée, quand ils rappellent, comme le faisait déjà le  Directeur général de l'Unesco en 1962, que "les résultats acquis dans la lutte  contre l'analphabétisme sont à la fois encourageants et décourageants", puisqu'on  constate qu'"il y a des efforts nationaux isolés avec des degrés d'intensité et  d'ampleur variables, mais [qu']il n'y a pas un effort mondial à la mesure du  fléau mondial".
8.4 Ce sentiment melé de déception et d'espoir est bien la preuve que, si  quelque chose ne va pas, il faut changer, non de cap, mais de méthodes - ce qui  Veut dire, étymologiquement, de chemin - pour poursuivre inlassablement notre  action. I1 s'agit, en clair, d'essayer d'atteindre, en cette fin de siècle, avec  Plus de succès, le but recherché, qui est celui d'éliminer toutes les formes de  discrimination dans le domaine éducatif - qu'elles soient fondees sur le sexe,  l'âge ou la condition sociale - de façon qu'on ne puisse plus parler d'analpha-  betisme dans le siècle 5 venir, sinon comme d'un mauvais souvenir.
8.5 Nouvelles méthodes, nouvelles strategies : il s'agit d'un objectif non  pas limité, mais global, dont la réalisation necessite des efforts convergents  et Complémentaires : la lutte contre l'analphabétisme des adultes et des jeunes  suppose simultanément la generalisation de l'éducation primaire - OU de base,  comme l'on voudra -, l'élargissement de l'éducation permanente - de façon a évi-  ter l'analphabétisme de retour, dont même les pays développés sont victimes -,  une formation professionnelle appropriée et une motivation culturelle à la mesure  à la fois des traditions et de la modernité propres à chaque pays, dans le  respect des identités nationales et régionales inhérentes à leur aire de  civilisation.
8.6 Si MM. Isaksson et Thiam reconnaissent dans leur étude en profondeur  que "la conclusion essentielle à tirer de l'analyse de l'action de l'Unesco  depuis quarante ans est probablement que le niveau national est le seul auquel  des objectifs, des programmes, des moyens peuvent être identifiés de manière  réaliste" et que "c'est en fonction de ces politiques et besoins nationaux que  la coopération sous-régionale, régionale et internationale peut se voir elle-même  conçue selon une stratégie également réaliste", c'est bien parce qu'ils ont  lucidement perçu que l'alphabétisation, ayant une portée universelle, doit  emprunter des voies spécifiques, en tenant compte des différences culturelles  qui caractérisent chaque peuple. Non pas pour l'enfermer dans sa coquille, mais  bien pour promouvoir un dialogue enrichissant, OU les expériences de chacun,  avec ses côtés positifs et négatifs, ses réussites et ses échecs, puissent être  prises en compte, comme des modèles à suivre ou des antimodèles à rejeter.
8.7 Ce n'est pas la même chose d'alphabétiser un adulte ou un jeune, un  homme ou une femme, en Asie, en Afrique, en Amérique latine ou en Europe, malgré  l'universalité du but 6 atteindre, qui est l'accès à la lecture et 5 l'écriture,  dans des langues ayant une origine et une histoire diverses, dans le cadre de  systèmes et de normes différents, même quand ils sont issus de la même matrice.  Les données de l'anthropologie culturelle, de la sociologie, de la psychologie  sociale, montrent la nécessité de développer des valeurs, des attitudes et des  comportements spécifiques si l'on veut assurer la réussite d'une action d'alpha-  bétisation adaptée aux conditions de chaque peuple et de chaque personne, traités  comme des sujets et non pas comme des objets passifs.
8.8 Permettez-moi de prendre comme exeniple mon propre pays : le Portugal  est une nation riche d'une histoire de huit siècles, d'une grande langue natio-  nale parlée dans cinq continents, d'une civilisation et d'une culture très spé-  cifiques mais ouvertes aux autres civilisations et cultures, un pays qui, fait  partie aujourd'hui de la Communauté européenne mais qui compte un retard econo-  mique åÛ à une industrialisation lente, une société en transition entre le rural  et l'urbain OU l'émigration reste importante. Les 18 à 19 % d'analphabètes que  compte encore le Portugal - les pourcentages peuvent d'ailleurs être beaucoup  plus élevés dans certaines régions de l'intérieur - sont surtout la trace d'un  certain sous-développement économique, en voie de disparition, mais ils ne tra-  duisent pas pour autant un manque de disponibilité culturelle. A preuve la  demande d'éducation de plus en plus grande qui s'exprime aujourd'hui, à la mesure  des transformations démocratiques en cours depuis quelques années après la chute  d'une dictature OU le malthusianisme culturel était de règle. Et bien, les  efforts d'alphabétisation actuellement entrepris ne peuvent pas ne pas tenir  compte de la spécificité des populations des différentes régions, sous peine  d'aller à l'échec. 11s doivent aller de pair avec l'absorption d'un résidu de 5 %  qui a échappé à la scolarité obligatoire de six ans, alors que la nouvelle loi  de base du système 6ducatif.prévoit son extension à neuf ans d'ici à 1996.
8.9 Quand j'étais, il y a quelques années, ministre de l'éducation, je me  suis rendu compte qu'il fallait, pour venir à bout de cette situation complexe,  une mobilisation simultanée de l'effort national et de l'effort régional, portant  sur des objectifs complémentaires, tels que l'accomplissement réel de l'obliga-  tion scolaire, grâce à une action sociale appropriée, la lutte contre l'échec et  l'abandon scolaires, l'orientation professionnelle et l'enseignement technique,  l'éducation de base des adultes et l'animation culturelle, tout ceci en motivant  les populations, les families, les autorités locales, les institutions civiques,  religieuses et intellectuelles avec une panoplie diversifiée de moyens visant,  dans leur ensemble, à donner à chaque citoyen une conscience culturelle 6 la  mesure d'une civilisation communautaire profondément enracinée dans les  populations.
8.10 Comme l'écrivait un grand poète portugais moderne, Almada Negreiros,  mettant en relief le caractère éminemment collectif de la civilisation et le  caractère plus spécifiquement individuel de la culture, "ce sont les possibilités  individuelles portugaises qui manquent surtout au Portugal". Ces possibilités  individueIles passent encore aujourd'hui, malgré une civilisation millénaire,  par l'alphabétisation, par l'éducation, par l'accès à la culture de tous les  Portugais.
8.11 Pour qu'un analphabétisme de retour, un analphabétisme fonctionnel, ne  succèdent pas à une alphabétisation de surface, il faut qu'il y ait ce que  j'appelle une alphabétisation culturelle, essentiellement portugaise et en même  temps, comme c'est la caractéristique propre de notre civilisation, tournée vers  l'universel. Je forme le voeu que le Plan d'action pour éliminer  l'analphabétisme d'ici à l'an 2000, qui coïncide en grande partie avec la  Décennie du développement culturel, soit l'occasion de mettre en pratique cette  nouvelle forme d'alphabétisation culturelle, OU viennent converger les  expériences que mènent chaque peuple, chaque aire et chaque région de  civilisation du monde, pour accéder à l'éducation et donc à la liberté. Merci.
(9) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  take the floor.
10.1 Mr ISAKSSON (Iceland) :  Mr President, if my maternal grandmother, Elinborg Palsdottir, were  still alive, she would now be exactly one hundred years old. She was born on
9 January 1887 on a small farm in northern Iceland. When she was about six years  of age, her parents had a teacher come to their home for a few weeks to teach her  brother to read. This was common practice in Iceland in those days. There was a  law in force about the teaching of reading, writing arid arithmetic to children.  And it was for the priests of the Evangelical Lutheran Chuïch of Iceland to  control the children's level of knowledge in connection with their religious  confirmation, which took place at the age of 13 or 14. Nobody could be confirmed  if he or she did not know how to read and write, as well as the rudiments of  religion. But there was not yet any organized overall school system in the  country, and primary education, including the teaching of the three R's, took  place mostly in the children's homes, especially in the countryside.
10.2 Petur, my grandmother's brother, was two years older than she was. And  the time had come to teach him to read and write. But his little sister also  wanted to learn. She implored, she cried and she made a lot of noise about it.  Finally, to restore peace to the house, her parents and the teacher agreed that  she could 'sit in', as it were, without being taught directly. This meant that,  whereas her brother and the teacher were sitting side by side on a bed, and  working on a small table in front of them, the little girl was allowed to sit on  the other side of the table and observe. This was how my grandmother learned to  read, that is, seeing the lekters and learning the letters upside down, and  reading from right to left. She once told me that until her late adolescence she  read faster this way than the normal way we do with the Latin alphabet.
10.3 My grandmother later was taught formally by an itinerant teacher, but  her total perioà of schooling did not exceed 12 weeks. but she leasned a lot by  herself. She was always a voracious reader. She read the most diverse sublects,  from poetry and the Icelandic sagas to astronomy and even politics, for instance.  I am convinced that she had read more books than I have - even if I am one of  those who are called inte1lectuals.  I thank the delegate of Portugal. I now invite the delegate of Iceland to
10.4 Mr President, my parents devoted their professional life to teaching  children how to read, and to training teachers for that purpose. They founded an  experimental school in Reykjavik more than 60 years ago. This school still  exists. The basic aim pursued is to develop appropriate group methods for  teaching 5 to 9 year-old children reading, writing and arithmetic, and about  their socio-historical environment.
10.5 Mr President, why am I telling a most respectable international body  like the General Conference of Unesco such stories of a personal character?  Perhaps I have just becorrie sentimental now that I am leaving the Executive Board  of Unesco. Or perhaps, quite modestly, I wish to explain my long-standing  interest in literacy work. Perhaps, even more ambitiously, I am doing so to  illustrate a great problem of macroscopic dimensions with examples drawn from  some micro-level experiences in the life of one family.
10.6 Mr President, a year ago the Special Committee of the Executive Board  did me the honour of entrusting me with carrying out an in-depth study of the  topic 'Unesco's literacy work: achievements, strategies and future action'. This  study, to which two speakers have referred in this debate and which I did in  co-operation with my colleague of Senegal, Mr Iba Der Thiam, was conducted during  the first three months of this year. Our report was issued in April and adopted  by the Executive Board at its 126th session last May and June. Among the  conclusions of the study, Mr President, let me mention three.
10.7 Firstly the political will of governments - that is, their resolute  policy-oriented commitment to giving priority to organized, sustained action for  eradicating illiteracy in the respective countries - ana secondly the motivation  of the target groups of learners are crucial factors for the success of any  literacy project. The fosmer should be used as much as possible to increase the  latter, and the latter should in the process gain a recognized right to  participate in moulding the former.
10.8 Second, no single strategy can be taken as a panacea to ensure effective  literacy work. There are many useful and appropriate strategies. Their choice
725    depends on government priorities, administrative structures, local circumstances,  and, last but not least, the nature of the illiteracy problem in the country,  region or district concerned.
10.9 Third, among the various aspects of literacy work, it would appear that  post-literacy work, including easy access to appropriate reading materials and  effective training of literacy personnel, can be considered as potentially  promising priorities for development and improvement.
10.10 Mr President, among the proposals made by myself and Mr Thiam, I shall  also mention three examples. First, the eradication of illiteracy is a task at  the core of Unesco's m'ission. Harnessing international solidarity, knowledge and  know-how for the solution of this world problem constitutes 'une grande cause'  and a basic 'raison d'être' for our Organization. Second, an international  literacy year to be conducteä jointly by Unesco and the United Nations, hopefully  in 1990, should provide the focus and formal beginning of a world literacy  campaign setting the targets for eliminating illiteracy in the world by the year
2000 or as soon as possible 'thereafter. And third, concerning the groups of  learners to whom literacy projects are addressed, Unesco should give priority to  programmes for women and girls who represent more'than 60 per cent of the total  number of illiterates in the world aged 15 years and over.
10.11 Mr President, in the last paragraph of their report, the rapporteurs of  the in-depth study on Unesco's literacy work stress the following essential  considerations: literacy is a basic human right; and concerns about literacy are  not only development-oriented, even in the largest; sense of the term they are  essentially ethical.
10.12 Mr President, I am certain that my grandmother would have agreed with  these principles when she, as a 6 year-old girl in the small farm of  Xjarvalsstadir in the province of Skagafjordur, in northern Iceland, in 1893, did  not want to give up her right to learn. Thank you, Mr President.
11. El PRESIDENTE:  los representantes del Grupo II, y en primer lugar al delegado de Bulgaria.  Doy las gracias al delegado de Islandia. Voy a dar la palabra ahora a  (il) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the delegate of Iceland. I shall now give the floor to the  representatives of Group II and first to the delegate of Bulgaria.
12.1 r-H AABHHKOB (Eonrapax):  rocnonw ïípencenaTenb reaepanbsofi KoHr#IepeHqaM, rocnonMH IIpencenaTenb McnonHmenb-  HOT0 COBeTa, r0CnOnMH hHepanbHbIfi, DMpeKTOP, 3aBTpa, 4 ~ o ~ 6 p x ,  MCïiOJIHñeTCR COpOK ODMH ron HenpepbIB-  HbIM yCMJiM5íM BHECKO, H.anpaBJIeHHb1M Ha JiMKBMHaqMW OnHOr0 M3 CaMblX CTpaUIHbIX 6enCTBHfi HaLUerO  BpeMeHM - HeïpaMOTHOCTM. YCTaB IOHECKO npoBo3rnauiae~, YTO OpTaHW3a~MR IlpM3BaHa IIOOqpHTb  pa3BMTMe HapOnHOïO 06pa30BâHWR M paCnp0CTpaHeHMe 'KyJibTYpbl, COTPYnHMYaR C POCynapCTBaMM - YJieHâMW  OpïaHM3aqMM Il0 MX npocb6e B Dene pâCüíMpeHMR IlpOCBeTMTeJIbHOfi neRTeJIbHOCTM, nO6MBaRCb COTPYRHM-  He3aBMCWMO OT PaCbI, nona MJIM KaKWX-JIM60 CO~MaJIbHO-3KOHOMMYeCKMX pa3JIMWfi.
12.2 nMKBMnaqM5i HeTpaMOTHOCTU CpenM BCeX JIWnefi MMpa - 3aBeTHaR Me'lTâ IIenaïOïa. Ee OCYIWCT-  BJieHMe 6 y n e ~  AOCTMXeHWeM OnHOïO W3 M~eaJiOB IOHECKO, KOTOpaR Ha IIpOTRXeHMM COpOKa JIeT 6ope~cx 3a  IipeROCTâBJIeHMe BCBM JIK)HRM nOJIHbIX A PaBHblX BO3MOXHOCTefi nJIx IlOJIyseHMñ 06pa30BaHMR.
12.3 AJIX TOïO 'lT06bI KâXnbIfi YeJIOBeK Moï yYaCTB0BaTb iLKTMBHO B XU3HM M npOqBeTaHMM CBOerO
06qeCTBa, YTO6bI MOï PaPMOHMYHO Pa3BMBaTbCR, OH noJIXeH YMeTb YMTaTb M IlMCaTb. AJIX TOPO YT06bI  BOJpaCTaJi IlpOI&X!C B3aMMHOïO 060rairle~~x KYJIbTYP M 06qeCTB JiWnM TOXe nOnXHbI YMeTb YMTaTb M iiMCâTb.  nO3TOMY M 6opb6a C HWpaMOTHOCTbW BCeïna XBJiRJiâCb OnHofi M3 IIepBOCTeneHHbIX qeJIefi IOHECKO.
12.4 B iiieCTAneCF1TbIX ronax, IlOCJIe BCTyIiJIeHMR B IOHECKO OCBO6O~MBIIlMXCR OT KOJIOHMaJIA3Ma  CTpaH, B eue 60~1w.1efi CTeneHM yBeJíMYMJIOCb 3HaZIeHMe IiPOïpaMM il0 JíMKBMnaqMM HeïPaMOTHOCTM. Benb  ORHUM M3 OCHOBHbIX IIpeIlRTCTBMfi Ha nyTW pa3BMTMñ OCBO6O!JMBUIWXCR CTpaH .FIBJiRJIäCb MaCCOBañ HeïpâMOT-  HOCTb. Torna BHECKO CTaJia UeHTPOM IlOCTORHHbIX YCWJIMfi B MMPOBOM MaCUITa6e, HanpaBJIeHHbIX Ha  OC03HaHMe Cepbe3HOCTM 3TOfi np06JIeMb1, Ha npMHRTMe aKqMfi QZnR ee JIWKBMnâqMW. IOHECKO ClleJIaJIaCb  eCTeCTBeHHbIM IJeHTPOM MeXJJYHapOnHOïO COTpynHMYeCTBa B 3TOfi O ~ J I ~ C T M ,  OCyI4eCTBMB CBOM nepBbIe  IlpOeKTbI pa3BMTMR 6a3o~oro 06pa30BaHMR B C03DaHMM 3KCIIepMMeHTaJIbHOfi IlpOïpaMÏVbI JIMKBMnaqMM Herpa-  MOTHOCTH.
12.5 AsansaTb TpeTbR CeCCMR reHepaJIbH0fi KOH$epeHqWW B cO$MM IIOpyYWJia reHepaJIbHOMy nHpeK-  TOPY nOnrOTOBKy IlpOeKTa BCeMMPHOfi CTpaTerMM no kfCKOpeHeHMW HeïPaMOTHOCTU BO BCeX PerMOsax MMpa DO  KOHqa BeKa, a TâKXe C03naHMW YCJIOBMfi RJiñ IlpOBeneHMR B 1990 rony MexnyHaponHoro ïORa TPaMOTHOCTM,  QeJibiQ KOTOpOïO 6yneT o 6 e c n e ~ e ~ ~ e  HeO6XOnUMbIX CpenCTB UJíñ OCyIIJeCTBJleHMR 3TOfi CTpaTeïMM.  YecTBa Mexny HaPonaMM B q e m x  nocTeneHHoro ocyqecTsneHMx Mneana n o c ~ y n ~ o c ~ u  0 6 p a 3 o ~ a ~ ~ R  J I R  Bcex,
(12.1) Mr DAVIDKOV (Bulgaria) (Translation from the Russian):  Mr President of the General Conference, Mr Chairman of the Executive Board,  Mr Director-General, tomorrow, 4 November, will mark forty-one years of unremitting  efforts by Unesco to eradicate one of the most disastrous phenomena of our times -  illiteracy. Under its Constitution, the Organization is called upon to give fresh  impulse to popular education and to the spread of culture, by collaborating with its  Member States, at their request, in the development of educational activities; by  instituting collaboration among the nations to advance the ideal of equality of  educational opportunity without regard to race, sex or any social or economic  distinctions.
(12.2) To free all the peoples of the world from illiteracy is the educator's  cherished dream. Its realization will constitute the fulfilment of one of th?  ideals of Unesco, which has been striving for the past forty years to achieve total  and indiscriminate access to education for all people
(12.3) Every individual, in order to play an active part in the life and  prosperity of society, and to develop harmoniously, must be able to read and write.  The mutual enrichment of cultures and societies also depends on literacy. This is  why the struggle against illiteracy has always been one of Unesco's foremost  concerns.
(12.4) During the 1960s after the countries which had been freed from colonialism  had joined Unesco, programmes for the eradication of illiteracy assumed even greater  significance. Large-scale illiteracy was, after all, one of the major impediments  to the development of these emancipated countries. It was then that Unesco became  the focal point for concerted efforts, on a worldwide scale, to assess the gravity  of the problem and to take remedial action. Unesco became the natural centre of  international collaboration in this domain, and carried out its first basic  education projects in the elaboration of an experimental programme for the  eradication of illiteracy.
(12.5) The twenty-third session of the General Conference at Sofia called on the  Director-General to prepare a comprehensive strategy for the eradication of  illiteracy from all the regions of the world before the end of the century, and to  take the necessary steps to make 1990 Internartional Literacy Year, the aim of which  would be to mobilize the resources required for the implementation of the strategy.
(12.6) During the present session of the General Conference, Member States have  confirmed their resolve to collaborate with Unesco in vanquishing illiteracy before  the end of the century.
(12.7) Within the framework of International Literacy Year, each Member State will  examine its national situation and draw up plans of action for the eradication of  illiteracy among children, adolescents and adults, and for the construction of a  solid educational system capable of confirming acquired knowledge and skills.
(12.8) Member States will determine the action they intend to take during  International Literacy Year. New forms of regional and international co-operation  will emerge, and fresh impetus will be given at the same time to the struggle  against worldwide illness and poverty.
(12.9) Improvement in the quality of national education programmes and the renewal  of their content to take account of social imperatives, together with the training  of teachers, will constitute a major advance against illiteracy.
(12.10) Despite economic and financial difficulties, Unesco has achieved numerous  successes. In Commission II, we have also been making progress. A consensus  resolution on supplementary funding for International Lit'eracy Year has been adopted.
(12.11) We, Unesco's Member States, all need to co-ordinate our efforts and to  direct them towards the quest for new ways of moving beyond the framework of  traditional programmes, in order to increase school attendance and to ensure that  better use is made of the financial, material and human resources at our disposal.  This, too, is a serious prerequisite for success.
(12.12) National and regional collaboration in this important domain cannot be  separated from international collaboration within the framework of Unesco. We hope  that support for'Unesco's activities in the struggle against illitercy will also be  forthcoming from other governmental and non-governmental organizations and from  nationally- regionally- and internationally-based funds and associations.
(12.13) Unesco acknowledges the significance of this struggle: to combat illiteracy  is at the same time to fight for human dignity, social equality, the progress and  wellbeing of peoples, and peace and international mutual understanding.
(12.14) Mr. President, in conclusion permit me in the name of the People's Republic  of Bulgaria to assure you that we shall support every measure that the Organization  takes t'o eradicate illiteracy. Let me also take this opportunity of congratulating  the winners of the Nadezhda K. Krupskaya Prize, the International Reading  Association Literacy Award, the Noma Prize and the Iraq Literacy Prize, and wish  them further successes in their noble endeavours. Thank you for your attention.
(13)  the delegate of the German Democratic Republic.  The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the delegate of Bulgaria for his statement and I give the floor to
14.1 Mr KOEHLER (German Democratic Republic):  Mr President, all of us agree that illiteracy is today one of the most  serious global problems. Unesco's statistics indicate that more than one thousand  million people, that is more than one quarter of the world's population, ageä 15  and over are unable to read or write. These few figures illustrate the magnitude  of the problem. At the end of the twentieth century, the age of micro-electronics  and space flights, there are people who make a mark or a thumbprint as their  signature.
14.2 In view of this grave situation we consider it imperative to mobilize  all States and nations for the preservation of a peaceful world, which uses its  huge material and intellectual potential in the interests of humanity, for  international co-operation based on equality with a view to resolving global  problems. The proclamation by the United Nations General Assembly of an  international literacy year in 1990 could effectively support this concern and  give fresh impetus to the efforts of Unesco and its Member States in this field.  The importance of the project is also underlined by the fact that the eradication
23  of illiteracy was formulated as one of the paramount aims of the International  Development Strategy for the Third United Nations Development Decade.
14.3 We understand very well that, for the countries of Asia, Africa and  Latin America where about 98 per cent of all illaterates live, the complete  eradication of illiteracy now, as before, constitutes an indispensable  prerequisite for the further democratization of education, the implementation of  equal rights to education for all and further social development. In the  meantime, it is generally recognized that the struggle against illiteracy is a  national priority task of really historical dimensions, and that it is therefore  necessary for the international community to render assistance to the countries  concerned. Special tribute should be paid to the efforts undertaken by many  developing countries to come closer to the great humanistic objective of  completely eradicating illiteracy by the planning, management and co-ordination  of .all literacy activities at national level. We share the view of numerous  Member States that illiteracy is neither a fatality nor an insurmountable  permanent phenomenon. This is illustrated by the experience gained in the  Mongolian People's Republic, Cuba, Nicaragua, India, Ethiopia, Zimbabwe or the  Syrian Arab Republic. The list of encouraging examples could be continued. It is  important to study the experience of the above countries carefully and t? make  use of it.
14.4 We also agree with all those who say that the eradication of illiteracy  is inseparable from the solution of the most urgent global problems facing  mankind today, notably the safeguarding of peace, arms limitation, disarmament  and the creation of an international climate or collective security, trust and  co-operation. It is our conviction that the solution of global and complicated  problems such as the eradication of illiteracy calls for considerable resources  that cannot be released without halting the arms race and redistributing the  resources spent on it. In this context, we attach special importance to the  establishment of a United Nations fund 'Disarmament for Development'. I refer to  the relevant proposal submitted by the USSR in the United Nations.
14.5 Mr President , the elimination of illiteracy has always ranked  prominently among Unesco's activities. This is reflected in the report of the  Director-General on the preparation of International Literacy Year. The pertinent  activities are part of the general efforts undertaken by the Organization to  implement the global strategy for the elimination of illiteracy by the year 2000.  This defines at the same time the historical dimension of that task. It should be  our common concern to create the fundamental bases for it now.
14.6 The 'Statement of Ulan Eator', which we fully approve, defines the  objectives of this international year of action and outlines the relevant tasks  for the Organization and its Member States. The preparation of the World Pian of  Action to eradicate illiteracy by the year 2000 is undoubtedly of decisive  importance. The tasks and activities proposed in the Draft Programme and Budget  for 1988-1989 and in documents 24 C/67 and 24 C/78 submitteä by the Director-  General for the eradication of illiteracy meet with our full approval.
14.7 We also support the view that their implementation calls for common  efforts by all Member States, an interdisciplinary and intersectoral approach by  the Organization and close co-ordination and co-operation with the other  Specialized Agencies within the United Nations system. The preparation of the 2nd  World Congress of Ministers of Education on the eradication of illiteracy in all  regions of the world by the year 2000 can give an important impetus to increased  efforts in this field.
14.8 The German Democratic Republic also strongly argues the causal relation-  ship between the universality of primary education and the renewal and improve-  ment of its contents to completely eradicate illiteracy as set out in Major  Programme II. Experience gathered to date demonstrates that the ädjustment of the  content and quality of primary education to social needs and the improved  co-ordination of all elements of formal and non-formal education are indispen-  sable for attaining the challenging aim of eliminating illiteracy.
14.9 Mr President, in the last few decades the German Democratic Republic has  systematically undertaken efforts to establish an efficient educational system.  This is part and parcel of an economic, social and cultural policy aimed at the  well-being of the people. In a development process carried over many years, rich  experience was gathered. At the same time, the German Democratic Republic has  always tried to help others, to pass on its experience to those interested and to  make its contribution to the development of international co-operation.
14.10 The German Democratic Republic renders assistance to developing  countries for the training of national personnel by providing teaching materials  and advisory services. In the framework of Unesco, the German Democratic Republic
729    has always demonstrated its willingness to make available the experience acquired  in the development and implementation of educational strategies and programmes in  the field of general education for the various projects of the Organization in  the field of literacy work. My country is prepared to continue along those lines.
14.11 Mr President, an important aspect of the struggle against illiteracy is  to focus public attention on this problem. It is necessary to make the public  aware of the causes oi: illiteracy and to show ways and means of eradicating it  with a view to mobilizing the international community to practise active  solidarity. The German Democratic Republic also observes 8 September, Inter-  national Literacy Day, as a significant highlight. Everybody has to realize this:  the elimination of illiteracy is the common task of all the peoples on our earth.  Thank you very much for your attention.
(15)  and I give the floor to the delegate of the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics.  The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the delegate of the German Democratic Republic for his statement
16.1  KOMneTeHTHOh aYnHTOPMM, IIO-BMnMMOMy, HeT HeO6XO~MMOCTM y6eXnal.b ~oro-ns60 B TOM, 9TO TpaMOTHOCTb  BCeïO HaCeJIeHHR - HeO6XOnUMOe YCJIOBMe II HeOT-beMJieMaR 9aCTb COBpeMeHHOïO. CO~AaJIbHO-3KOHOMMUeCKO-  r-H BYPRmKI/IH (COI03 COBeTCKMX COqMantiCTM9ecKMx Pecny6n~~):  YsaxaeMbIfi rocnonm IIpencenaTenb! YsaxaeMbIe nenerami! B 3TOfi npewraamenbHofi A  ro ~ ~ J B M T M R  BO Bcex persosax m p a ,  o m a  133 nepaoouepensbIx 061qeseno~e9ec~ax 3aua9.
16.2 Hama neneraqm nonHocTbIo nonnepmmae-r npennoxeHHbre ïeHepanbHofi KoH@epeHqaeB Mepo-  ~ ~ M R T H R  no JIMKBMnaUUM HerpaMoTHocTu K 2000 rony M npoaeneemo B 1990 rony MexnyHaponHoro roua  rpaMOTHOCTM M 3aBepReT, ZIT0 COBeTCKHfi COI03 BHeCeT S@@eKTHBHbIk BKJIân B yCnf?mHOe OCyqeCTBneHHe  STAX MepOnpMRTMfi.
16.4 no MCTOpM9eCKMM MepKaM HeUaBHO - HO BenaKok OKTR6pbCKOfi COqManMCTMYeCK06 PeBOJIIo-  HeïpaMOTHbI. MHorse HapOnHOCTM He MMeJIM CBOeÜ IlMCbMeHHOCTM. B ny6~1MKaqMRx TeX neT, âHaJIM3MpyR  TeHneHqMM yBenH9eHMñ 9HCJIâ TpaMOTHbIX, iipMXOnMJIM K BbIBOay, UT0 HJiR TOïO, 9 ~ 0 6 ~  JIMKBMJIMPOBaTb  HeI'iXlMOTHOCTb B POCCMM, nOTpe6yeTCR 4 500 neT. H O  XM3Hb OnpoBeprJIa 3TM nPOïH03bI.
16.5 CpenM iIepBbIX neKpeTOB COBeTCKOfi BJIaCTM 6brn AeKpeT O JIMKBMRaqMW HeïPaMOTHOCTM. Ero  peaJiM3aqMñ y HaC OCy~eCTBnRJiaCb OnHOBpeMeHHO C PeLiieHMeM BCeX npyrMX 3KOHOMMqeCKMX W CO~HäJlbHbIX
9eCKyI0 HHTepBeHUMI0, 3aCyXy, rOJIOn, pa3pyXy. BOJlee TOTO, 6bICTPbIfi 3KOHOMMYeCKMfi npOTpeCC 6bm 6b1  HeMbICJIMM 6e3 OJJHOBpeMeHHOïO PemeHMR npO6JIeMbI JIMKBHnaqMM HeTpaMOTHOCTM, C03nâHHR CI YKpenneHMR  BCeX HeO6XOnMMbIX 3BeHbeB HapOnHOTO 06pa30BaHMR.
16.6 BbIn nepHon, KOïna BCX CTpaHa Cena 38 IlapTbI. YYHJIMCb BCe: MyXYMHbI II XeHIlJHHbI, MJIaA iI CTap.  POHHOMY R3bIKY y9MJIUCb BCe HâpOnHOCTM Hamefi MHOTOHaqMOHaJIbHOk CTPaHbI. AnSI HeKOTOPbIX 83 HMX 6brna  CO3uaHa IIMCbMeHHOCTb. zI~06b1 HpenOTBpaTHTb «llOBTOPHY€O HeTpaMOTHOCTb», BKJIIQYWTb 3TM HapOnHOCTM B  aKTMBHyW nOJIUTM9eCKyI0, SKOHOMM9eCKYIo M KYJIbTYPHYIO XM3Hb, B KOpOTKMfi CPOK Ha pâ3JIM9HbiX R3bIKâX
6b1n OpïaHH30BaH BblIIyCK ï¿i3eT, XypHâJIOB, LUKOJIbHbIX YYe6HHKOB M Xy?JOXeCTBeHHOfi JlMTepaTypbI. EblJIa  IIpOneJIaHa OrpOMHaR Opi'aHU3aqMOHHâñ pa60~a, nOUHRBUaX MMJIJIMOHbI TPYJJRqMXCR Ha 6ûpb6y C HeïpaMOT-  HOCTbIO. BeCOM 6b1n BKJIan B 3Ty 6ûpb6y PYCCKOk MHTeJìJIMreH~MM, M npeXne BCWO y9MTeJIefi. MHorIie 113 HMX  BbIeXaJIti B CWibCKyI0 rJIy6MHKy, C03HaTeJIbHO JIMLUMBLUMCb IIpMBbI9HOfi OGCTaHOBKH, MHOïMX 6nar. HepenKO  iiOnBepïaR CBOIO XH3Hb OiiaCHOCTM, OHM HeCJIM JIK)HRM CBeT 3HaHWfi, npso6qans K COBpeMeHHOfi KyJIbType.  MHe OCO6eHHO XOTeJIOCb 6b1 nOn9epKHyTb 6eCKOPbICTHOCTb 3TOï0 nBMXeHMR, er0 3HTy3Mâ3M. 3TO B HeMaJIOfi  CTeiEHH C~OC06CTBOBaJIO TOMY, 9TO C HeïPaMOTHOCTbIO 6b1no IIOKOHSeHO He 9epe3 4 500 JIeT, KaK HaM  pa3BeTBJïeHHaR CUCTeMa HapOnHOrO 06pâ30BaHMX, KOTOpañ IIOCTORHHO HapaIqMBaeT CBOfi n0TeHqMaJl.
3aTeM II K 06H3aTeJIbHOMy iiOJIHOMy CpeAHeMy 06pa30BaHMIo IlJIR BCefi MOJlOneXM. EXeronHo y HâC CMCTeMâTW-
9eCKUMM @OpMaMM 0 6 y ~ e ~ m  M ~OBbIIIieHAR KBaJIM@MKaL(HH OXBaTbIBaeTCR 6onee YeTBepTM HaCeJleHMR.  PeIIIaIOTCX sanaus HenpepbIBHOrO 06pa30BaHMX BCeX pa6o~a10u~x, ~ceo6qero 3KOHOMMYeCKOfO M KOMTIbI-0-  TepHOro 0 6 y 9 e ~ m .  nOCTOXHH0 HapäWHBaeTCX BbInyCK YYMTeJIek C BbICWMM 06pa30BaHMeM. CekiYâC KZIXHbIfi  WTBepTbIfi CTYHeHT TOTOBATCR CTaTb y9MTeJleM.  UMM, 70-ne~ne KOTOPO~~ OTMeqaeTcx B  TM HHM, - A B Haruefi c-rpaae 6onee EBYX TpeTeB HaceneHm 6b1nn  npo6ne~, B onope Ha CBOM pecypcbi, 6e3 IIOMOUM M ~ B H ~ ,  HecMoTpn Ha rpamuaHcKyIo BORHY n mnepManncTw  npenpeeana no peBonIoqkis, a uepe3 HenonHbIx 20 neT, TO ecTb B 1937 rony. J h n a  c03ua~a rn6~ax,
(16.1) Mr. BOURDYKINE (Union Soviet Socialist Republics) (Translation from the  Russian) :  Mr. President, distinguished delegates, it is obviously unnecessary to  convince any member of this representative and highly-qualified gathering that  universal literacy constitutes a prerequisite for and an integral part of  contemporary social and economic development in all regions of the world, and that  its attainment is one of the tasks to which mankind in its entirety should accord  prior i ty .
(16.2) Our delegation fully endorses the proposals by the General Conference that  measures be taken to eradicate illiteracy by the year 2000 and to declare 1990  International Literacy Year; you may be assured that the Soviet Union will make an  effective contribution to the success of these measures.
(16.3) As we have done in the past and as we are doing today, we shall continue to  offer support and assistance to Unesco’s programmes, to regional and national  eff&rts to create up-to-date systems of education, and to measures taken by States  to increase the number of their citizens who have acquired the fundamentals of  literacy and to whom the treasures of world science, technology and culture have  thus become accessible.
(16.4) Only a short while ago in historical terms - before the Great October  Socialist Revolution, the 70th anniversary of which is being celebrated at the  moment - more than twothirds of the population of our country were illiterate. Many  of its nationalities had no written language. Contemporary analyses of the creeping
731    curve of increasing literacy drew the conclusion that it would take 4,500 years to  eradicate illiteracy in Russia, a forecast that subsequent events proved very wrong.
(16.5) One of the first pieces of legislation adopted by the Soviet authorities  was a decree on the eradication of illiteracy. Its implementation coincided with  the solution of a whole range of other economic and social problems; we had only our  own resources to rely on; there was no external assistance; civil war was raging and  we had to cope with imperialist intervention, drought, famine and devastation. What  was clear above all was that rapid economic progress was inconceivable without the  eradication of illiteracy and the forging and strengthening of all the necessary  links of a national education system.
(16.6) There was a time when the whole country was at school. Everybody was a  learner: men and women, youngsters and old folks alike. The peoples of our many  nationalities all studied their native languages; for some of them written forms had  to be created. To prevent relapses into illiteracy and to involve these peoples  actively in political, economic and cultural affairs, the publication of newspapers,  periodicals, school books and literature in their languages was speedily set in  motion. Millions of workers were mobilized in the enormous task of organizing the  struggle against illiteracy, the burden of which was borne by the Russian  intelligentsia, and above all by the teachers. Many of them voluntarily abandoned  their habitual surroundings and comforts and went to the most distant rural areas,  frequently risking their own lives as they carried the torch of learning to the  people, lighting the way to modern culture. I should like especially to stress the  disinterested nature and enthusiasm of this movement, which contributed in no small  measure to the fact that illiteracy was conquered in 1937, that is to say in the  space of less than 20 - rather than 4,500 - years. A flexible diversified system of  education was created, the potential of which developed constantly.
(16.7) Even fascist aggression, despite the harm which it inflicted, was unable to  halt educational development. Universal primary education was succeeded by  compulsory eight-year education, and then by compulsory, complete secondary  education for all young people. In any given year, more than a quarter of the  population is engaged in formal education or further training. Lifelong education,  and training in general economics as well as the computer sciences, is becoming  available for all workers, while the output of graduate teachers is constantly  increasing. Today, one out of every four students is preparing for a teaching  career.
(16.8) Thousands of our teachers are working abroad, in the developing countries  among others, while more than 100,000 foreign students are attending Soviet higher  educational establishments and technical institutes. Two-and-a-half thousand young  Soviet men and women are studying abroad. And it is our intention to strengthen and  develop our co-operation with other countries in the training of specialists, and of  teachers in particular.
(16.9) A major task in the immediate future will be to enhance the effectiveness  of collaboration in the solution of the educational problems faced by differenct  countries. Our own secondary and higher educational systems are being reformed with  the aim of adapting them to scientific, technical and socio-economic progress,  ensuring their integration with the world of work, improving the quality of the  teaching they provide and - in short - encouraging the formation of well-rounded and  harmoniously developed personalities, capable of responding to the demands of the  society of tomorrow. In this reform process, we are following attentively and are  most eager to draw upon the positive experience of other countries. We believe,  too, that our experience in this reconstruction will be of interest to the Member  States of Unesco.
(16.10) Just over twelve years remain before the end of the second millennium.  Time is short. To eradicate illiteracy will require the mobilization of all  available resources, including international solidarity, the exchange of experience,  the provision of assistance and the utilization of this assistance with due regard  for all the specificities of economic and social structures, political systems,  cultures, beliefs, traditions, customs, mentalities and all the other factors chat  have a bearing on educational development.
(16.11) The realization of International Literacy Year and the implementation of  the strategy for the eïadication of illiteracy by the year 2000 will be unthinkable  without the stimulation and mobilization of public opinion, notably through the mass  tedia. This is rightly pointed out in the reports submitted by the Director-General  in documents 24 Cl78 and 24 C/67. By no means every newspaper, however, is dealing  with this noble and highly moral theme in a befitting manner. The newspapers of  Europe and North America should cover it more fully. As far as television is  concerned, what is a matter of vital concern seems to have provoked almost general  indifference. No small amount of effort on the part of all of us will be required  to overcome this indifference. In this connection, collaboration between Unesco and
23  the International Union of Journalists, the International Telecommunication Union  and other international and national organizations holds out some promise.
(16.12) The rate at which our educational problems - and in the first place that of  wiping illiteracy from the face of the earth - are solved will, in our opinion,  depend in great measure on the time which it takes to liquidate the burden of the  arms race and to make the world a safer place, free from violence. The enormous  resources that disarmament would make available can and should be directed towards  the eradication of illiteracy. At the same time, the combat for literacy should be  waged simultaneously with the education of the peoples in a spirit of peace, mutual  understanding, collaboration, humanism and democratism.
(16.13) The international community can and must do everything possible to secure  for each and every individual one of the basic human rights - the right to education.
(16.14) As regards the draft resolution submitted in document 24 C/67, we support  the proposal made by the delegate of the Mongolian People's Republic in  Commission II: a fifth operative paragraph should be added, inviting the  Director-General to submit to the General Conference at its twenty-fifth session a  report on the programme for International Literacy Year. Thank you for your  attention.  (M. Pein, Autriche, prend la présidence)
17. The PRESIDENT:  I thank the distinguished delegate of the Union of Soviet Socialist  Republics and I give the floor to the next speaker on our list, the distinguished  delegate of Argentina.
(18.1) Mrs BAIGORRIA (Argentina) (Translation from the Spanish):  Mr President, distinguished delegates, the twentieth century will be  remembered in history for its remarkable scientific discoveries, which overturned  assumptions unquestioned for millennia, conquered space and produced amazing  intellectual feats, but it will also be remembered for the struggle for human rights  among which the rights to freedom has become as essential as the right to life.
(18.2) The twentieth century has taken up that cause. Accordingly, illiteracy,  the appalling scale of which was revealed after the Second World War, has become a  major focus of debate around which every national, regional and international  meeting has devised educational as well as political and economic strategies for the  advance towards a fully literate twenty-first century.
(18.3) However, awareness of this tragic situation, this unjust deprivation  afflicting so many people on earth, has not yet fully awoken the conscience of the  world. Literacy plans have certainly proliferated in individual countries;  governments have established special structures to combat illiteracy energetically  and effectively and have prepared numerous meetings and studies; but a universal  determination to wage a fierce battle against illiteracy, which is perhaps the worst  affront to human dignity, is still wanting.
(18.4) International Literacy Year, which was welcomed at the General Conference  in Sofia and acclaimed at the Intergovernmental Conference for the Major Project in  the field of Education in Latin America and the Caribbean in Bogotá in March, should  be a means of raising the level of awareness of all peoples so that there may be a  great universal movement to endorse that objective which is so dear to Unesco and so  meaningful to us all.
(18.5) The presence of absolute illiteracy in so many deprived regions, the  increase in functional illiteracy, whose global proportions cannot be expressed in  statistical terms, illiteracy in the industrialized countries, whose serious  incidence has only just come to light - this situation reveals the need for total  mobilzation, which should be promoted primarily through the media and, where  possible, even by word of mouth, following the example of the minstrels of old. No  effort should be spared to fulfil the moral obligation, in the words of the great  Latin American humanist, Don Pedro Enrique Surena, 'to give the alphabet to every  one'. The alphabet should be imparted, not just as a mechanical tool for reading  and writing, but as an instrument for learning, thinking and understanding, for  awakening the critical faculties and progressing from empirical to rational  knowledge. In the process, the learners should not be cut off from their roots -  their own culture and traditions should be respected. Literacy education should  also enable the learner to discover the permanent and eternal aspects of humanity in  order to encourage each individual to identify with others, to begin to experience  the fullness of human fellowship and to achieve inner freedom, the only freedom  which leads to that individual self-determination without which, as René Maheu once  said, human beings will not make history, but will be condemned to endure it.
(18.6) The twenty-first century will also bring, in the form of knowledge, the  most powerful instrument for gaining political power. Those who do not attain the  necessary level of understanding to assimilate the constant stress of developments  in science and technoloy will form a new legion of slaves who will fall under the  dominion of an élite that is already forming.
23  ~(18.7) Mr President, distinguished delegates, this is the philosophy behind the  present literacy plan in my country, Argentina, which launched its first literacy  campaign with Law 1420 as far back as 1884, because it understood that 'educating'  the sovereign' was the best safeguard of democracy. I spoke about all the technical  aspects of the plan in Commission II, where I put in a great deal of effort on this  issue. However, in this plenary meeting and in my capacity as chairperson of the  Intergovernmental Committee for the Major Project in the field of Education in Latin  America and the Caribbean, I have sought merely to express a few ideas that may  encourage us to work hard and to renew our faith so that International Literacy Year  will throw open the way to final victory.
(18.8) In conclusion, Mr President and distinguished delegates, as long as  illiteracy with its burden of poverty, injustice and isolation persists, economic  development and social progress will never be achieved and international peace will  remain merely a tiresome rhetorical phrase. Thank you very much.
19. The PRESIDENT:  the distinguished delegate of Brazil.  I thank the distinguished delegate of Argentina and I give the floor to
20.1 Mr VALLE (Brazil):  Mr President, distinguished delegates, it is a fortunate fact that this  debate takes place only a few months after the VIth Regional Conference of  Ministers of Education and Those Responsible for Economic Planning of Member  States in Latin America and the Caribbean, which was organized by Unesco in  Colombia. I think the best contribution Brazil can make to this exchange of views  is to bring to the attention of the General Conference the results of that  regional Conference.
20.2 It is important to stress that the deliberations in Bogotá, though in  the Latin American and Caribbean sphere, are most valid for other developing  regions. Moreover, the diversity of situations between one Latin American country  and another increases the general interest of the conclusions reached.
20.3 The main element in the report of the Conference is certainly that the  Declaration of Bogotá touches on every important aspect of educational questions.  That document also shows the fertility of an interdisciplinary debate bringing  together educators and economic planners. Indeed, the Declaration of Bogota  proves that education in general and literacy in particular are intertwined with  the problems of population growth, rapid urbanization, insufficiency of economic  growth, deterioration of foreign trade conditions, external debt, the financial  crisis, management shortcomings and so forth.
20.4 As a whole, the population in the 15-years-old or more age-group in  Latin America increased from 163 million in 1970 to 253 million in 1965, i.e: a  growth of about 65 per cent in 15 years. The rate of' population growth varies  enormously from one country to another but it is generally high. In the Brazilian  case, even though the rate is decreasing, the rise in numbers some 15 years from  now will be equivalent to the present population of Mexico. Given this fact, it  would be necessary to double the investment in education every ten years or so in  order to do away with illiteracy. However, the same population that is plagued  with illiteracy is in urgent need of other basic elements such as housing, health  and sanitary facilities, transportation, employment .and so forth. The State is  placed then in a vicious circle that can only be broken by international  co-operation and, of course, fundamental changes in the international economic  relationship.
20.5 In this sense, one.of khe recommendations of MINEDLAC VI states that the  total elimination of illiteracy in the world requires, beyond national and  regional action, a global international strategy and an intense and sustained  effort of solidarity in the form of multilateral international co-operation. It  is from that angle that the debate in which we are engaged finds its true  meaning.
20.6 Developing countries are fighting on all fronts to overcome the immense  difficulties that weigh upon them. They have the will and the tools to reduce  significantly the problem of illiteracy. But every effort in this direction is  thwarted by the counter-pressures of other problenis. This sessior1 would be a  successful one if we could reach a consensus on the connection between  educational problems and unfair economic situation and on the need for a true  global co-operation.
20.7 Besides this central question concerning the interrelationship between  the economic situation and illiteracy, I would also touch on the cultural side.of  the question. It is important that we start viewing the alphabet as one of the
735    codes for literacy. The technological changes we are living through demand a  broader concept of literacy and the assumption that our children are already  reading in a way different trom ourselves. We must-face the present obstacles and  together prepare the future.
20.8 Brazil, as a developing country with a predominantly young population  and with a high rate of demographic growth, has traditionally been faced with the  problem of illiteracy. The efforts to promote literacy, even though intensified  in the last decades, date back to the, second decade of this century, when the  first campaigns were launched, The objectives of our literacy policy are  certainly difficult to set up, but they must necessarily include both the  generalization of primary schooling, the implementation of programmes of  instruction for out-of-school adults, and the fostering of socio-economic  conditions favourable to the promotion of literacy.
20.9 A proper .literacy policy has to make a distinction between a literate  person - one who can both read and write - and a functional literate - one who,is  able to engage in all those activities in which literacy is required for  effective functioning of his group and community. Besides the setting up of those  objectives and the drawing of some essential distinctions, policy-makers in  developing countries are confronted with a great number of intricate issues when  they wish to formulate a literacy policy. Regarding the definition of strategies,  should we favour a 'campaign strategy' involving a large-scale series ,of  activities, or should we focus on the promotion of 'functional literacy' - a  concept which, in a way, was formulated as a reaction to the 'campaign strategy',  considered by some to be too general to be effective?
20.10 Mr President, Brazil's past experience in this field has been quite  diversified and is worth looking at attentively. Indeed, we have had examples in  our country of quite different approaches to the problem of promotion of  literacy. On the one hand, we have had the experience of literacy seen as a  process of 'cultural action', the term used by Paulo Freire, the Brazilian  educator who was recently awarded Unesco's International Prize for Peace  Education. His pedagogy is not L-estricted to the goal of teaching fluent reading  but is rather aimed at the rediscovery and reinterpretation of reality through  the critical analysis of a limited number of 'generative words' chosen according  to their social and psychological connotations. This method has had its merits,  although it has proven to be difficult to apply on a large scale. On the other  händ, our country has also witnessed the experience of the Brazilian Literacy  Movement - MOBRAL - which is a familiar name to literacy workers throughout the  world. It has brought a considerable reduction in the short term in both the  absolute number of illiterate adults and the overall literacy rates. In 1982,  MOBRAL was awarded one of Unesco's International Literacy Prizes.
20.11 The struggle against illiteracy should not be envisaged as a goal in  itself but,. rather,. should be viewed in its proper social and political  perspectives, which cannot be overcome through isolated actions. Literacy should  also be a means to contribute to the promotion of mobilization and the cohesion  of society.
20.12 In spite of the literacy campaigns launched in the last decades and the  other modalities for the promotion of literacy, in 1980 approximately
18.7 million of the Brazilian population of 15 years of age or above were  illiterate.
20.13 There is certainly a dichotomy between the favourable results achieved  in the rate of economic growth and those accomplished in the struggle against  illiteracy. We have witnessed, however, a long-term tendency towards a reduction  in the relative rate of literacy in the population aged 5 years or above, which  has strongly declined from 82 per cent in 1972 to 32 per cent in 1980. This  relative figure, however, is in contrast with a growth in the level of illiteracy  in absolute terms.
20.14 Mr President, Brazilian society is committed to democracy. We are  convinced that such a goal cannot be fully achieved without deeper involvement in  the problem of the still unequal distribution of educational opportunities.  Promotion of literacy and democratization of education are two major goals of  Brazilian educational policy. It is our conviction that the realization of those-  two goals are essential to the promotion of two aspirations of Brazilian society,  i.e. the promotion of social justice and economic development within a context of  political democracy.
20.15 May I refer now, Mr President, to functional literacy programmes, which  have as objectives a combination of individual development and community  development, in such a way as to contribute to a better knowledge of both of the  rights and duties of individuals, to promote family and community, health, to
736    foster the preservation of community assets and institutions, and thÜs to support  general public welfare.
20.16 In this age of technology, literacy efforts should learn to put  technology to work: to deliver teaching and training through communications  media; to develop management information systems; and to develop training,  supervision and logistical systems.
20.17 This diversified experience of strategies for literacy promotion has  convinced us of the need to search for new approaches to face the problem. They  are not clear yet, and they are certainly difficult to define, but there is no  doubt that a strong need exists to face those challenges with an open mind, with  a broad view and with a strong political determination to overcome them.
20.18 The promotion of literacy should always be viewed within the global  aspirations of society. The ultimate goals of social justice, economic  development and political democracy cannot be fully achieved without an adequate  emphasis on the promotion of education. Literacy, we all agree, is the first step  to education and, therefore, the essence of democracy. I thank you, Mr President.
21. The PRESIDENT:  next speaker, the distinguished delegate of Costa Rica.
(22.1) Mrs RIVERA de SOLAS (Costa Rica) (Translation from the Spanish):  Mr President , distinguished delegates, Karol Wojtila, who at that time was  still a young student completing his secondary schooling in Wadowice, Poland, said  in his valedictory address several years before the outbreak of the Second World War  that I... freedom is the root of human morality'. This was a profound thought  expressed by the future Supreme Pontiff of the Catholic Church. Freedom is the root  of human morality.
(22.2) I wished to begin my few words with this quotation and not with the usual  expressions of gratitude, so as to. avoid repetition, because I sincerely believe  that the opportunity which the General Conference has given us this morning to  express our thoughts on behalf of Central America regarding the celebration of  International Literacy Year in 1990 is a special one, in that it enables us to  reiterate in this world forum the desire of all Central Americans to raise the flag  of freedom in Central America in the long and arduous battle for democracy and peace.
(22.3) Unseco's statistics for 1985 place the number of illiterates throughout the  world at 889 million people, or 27.7 per cent of the total population. There are
44 million illiterates in Latin America and the Caribbean, or 17.3 per cent of the  population; of these there are 4,600,000 illiterates in Central America and Panama,  or 31 per cent of that population.
(22.4) These appalling figures and percentages cannot be ignored. Here, in a  forum such as this, those who advocate projects to redress these evils should not  weaken in their determination. We are aware of the limitations of our present  circumstances, but Unesco should, without a doubt, play its part in the construction  of a more just, more equitable, more democratic and more peaceful world society.  Unesco is contributing to that great plan for humanity through the Major Project in  the field of Education in Latin America and the Caribbean. Not only has it devoted  itself whole-heartedly to solving the problem of illiteracy by providing guidelines  for the Member States, but it has declared literacy education as a priority task  which goes beyond mere short-term interest.
(22.5) Allow me now to make a reference to my country. All the people of Costa  Rica are celebrating with great enthusiasm the anniversary of the abolition of the  army as a permanent institution in Costa Rica on 1 December 1948, when President  Figueres, as he then was, solemnly declared that 'today the regular army of Costa  Rica, worthy representative of the National Liberation Army, is handing over the  key of these barracks to the schools, which will convert it into a cultural centre.  We are staunch supporters of the ideal of a new world in America. To this native  land of Washington, Lincoln, Bolivar and Marti, we would say today, "O America,  other peoples, that are also your children, offer you their deeds of greatness.  Little Costa Rica offers you now and for always its heartfelt love of civilization,  democracy and constitutional order"'. These were the words spoken by President  Figueres.
(22.6) What a great and noble event! United as one family, with no partisan  differences, the Costa Ricans confirmed our unshakeable determination to defend  civilization and peace against the stock-piling of arms and military violence.  Consequently, since that time one third of our national budget has been invested in  education, thereby reducing our illiteracy rate substantially.
(22.7) Together with all our Central American brothers and sisters, we want homes  instead of barracks, schools instead of cannons, and children, young people, women  and men who are literate, not illiterate. We believe that pens and ploughshares  constitute the best arsenal, and that there is no greater glory than peace.
(22.8) The literacy education that we want for our America and for the world is  one which goes much further than the mere ability to interpret symbols.  Accordingly, we believe that educators today have a tremendous responsibilty in  preparing their students not only to cope successfully with the complex society of  the twenty-first century, but also to contribute to its construction, so that they  may confront it in complete awareness of their individual and collective  responsibilities as fully developed human beings.
(22.9) Literacy today cannot, I repeat, be restricted to the ability to interpret  symbols and the accumulation of knowledge: knowlege for knowledge's sake has little  value. More than ever before, the concept of literacy today must include not only  the dissemination of basic skills but also the inculcation of major universal values.
(22.10) To provide literacy education for a better society, we need teachers who  embrace their teaching profession with sincerity. They must clearly recognize the  fact that they are apostles: apostles of peace, justice, truth and respect, They  must clearly recognize the fact that as literacy educators they are sowers: sowers  of the seeds of love, learning, hope and freedom. Where teachers are not apostles  and sowers, education ceases to be a creative human process and becomes bogged down  in indoctrination and dogma.
(22.11) We are aware that there are many paths in literacy education. They all  have their own justification and often follow similar routes to identical paths and  goals. However, whatever methodological, epistemological and ideological path a  teacher may choose, he or she must have a steady commitment to the individual as the  fundamental unit of society.
(22.12) The individual must be saved if we wish to save the citizen. There should  be no dichotomy between the person adti society, or between the individual and the  group. But how can the excellence of the whole be ensured when its constituent  parts are sick and feeble? There is no substitute for the individual, and there is  no greater security for society than the confidence which stems from the  self-awareness of its individual members.
(22.13) This morning here in this great international forum, we met to contemplate  the future of people who are living in total ignorance: the illiterates of the  world. It is on their behalf that we wish to make an act of faith; for we are in  fact meeting to proclaim a return to humanity and to basic human values which have  been obscured by the spectre of poverty, violence, war and illiteracy. This is an  act of faith.
(22.14) Back to human beings: to the farmer, the intellectual and the builder, all  united with their fellows. in an unjust world where hatred is sown instead of love.  Back to human beings: one where optimistic hands work to build a promising future  for the generations of new citizens who will inherit the earth. Back to human  beings: not as an abstraction apart from the .socio-economic conditions of human  groups, but as an integral part of these, in whose warmth they will find their true  dimensions and achieve their vital objectives. This morning we have shown that to  return to humanity in an age of humanism is the inevitable responsibility of human  beings. Thank you very much.
23. The PRESIDENT:  to the distinguished delegate of Trinidad and Tobago.
24.1 Mrs SOLOMON (Trinidad and Tobago):  Thank you, Mr President. The English-speaking Caribbean States. did me  the honour, but at a ,rather late date, of asking me to speak on their behalf at  this debate. So you will not find from me the polished expertise that has been  the hallmark of this discussion so far. I am an interim speaker who, however,  will attempt to put across to you some of the views and concerns of the  Caribbean, not only about our area, but about Unesco's possibilities of achieving  the total eradication of illiteracy by the year 2000.  I thank the distinguished delegate of Costa Rica, and I give the floor
24.2 Within the very small area of the Caribbean, there are, as you know,  very many separate States and there are an iimazing number of differences in the  level of literacy, even within that small area; and that, I think, is an  indication, a symbol, of the complexity of the problem of illiteracy. Illiteracy  is automatically, when we think about it, the most complex issue that we have to  face, and I think it has always been associated to some extent with inequality. 1  recall a cartoon which illustrates this point somewhat frivolously: it showed a  stone-age man sitting, very diligently carving the first alphabet in stone, while  his friends assembled around him, looking extremely worried, are saying, 'DO you  know what you have done? You have just made us all illiterate'.
24.3 So levels of literacy automatically create levels of inequality between  those who have and those who do not have the same levels. But I think it would be  useful to put into context, into some kind of universal context, our efforts in  literacy, because it is a somewhat new idea - now taken for granted - that  everyone ought to be able to read. This notion of mass literacy is an idea that  belongs to our age. It has not always been true, and I was particularly struck by  Mr Isaksson's story of his grandmother, which I thought was so true a story which  illustrated so many things to me. One was that learning is something that is  self-motivated; another that women are the last to be given the facilities to do  it; but, more than anything else, and I think that this may relate to our present  problem, that the problem of literacy is not necessarily a problem of the school  system. And I think that, if we could separate those two ideas, we might be able  in the future to come up with even more innovative strategies for tackling  literacy.
24.4 The past has been characterized by a very strong emphasis on improving  our school systems, a very necessary emphasis; and yet we are finding in the  developed world a new phenomenon of the relapse into illiteracy, in spite of the  fact that in those States there is the money and the facilities for creating  excellent school systems. There must therefore be something deeper that we must  look at. And perhaps the problem of illiteracy in the industrialized countries  may be linked, not to inequality and poverty, but to the very presence and access  to very many different media of communication. In that sense, it may not be the  same problem, and we may confuse our methodology if we use the all-inclusive term  of 'illiteracy' to cover the phenomenon linked to poverty and inequality and the  phenomenon linked to the appearance of different types of media of communication.  And I would illustrate that phenomenon by the first line in a science fiction  story which I read recently, which began, 'When he was thirty-two years old, John
23  Brown decided to learn to read, having already passed his B.A. and M.A. exams'.  So, maybe, we have to put learning to read in a completely new context.
24.5 I am raising these points, which will become methodological points,  because I think there is a tendency to treat the term 'literacy' like the term  motherhood and say we are all in favour of literacy. But that may confuse the  issue somewhat when we come down to work out precise strategies of how we, in  each of our countries, and we, as Unesco, will confront this problem.
24.6 I have heard it said that illiteracy is the worst scourge of our age. I  think perhaps that this is an exaggeration. I know that I am not speaking the  orthodox gospel, but I am making this point to link it to Unesco's Constitution.  Because we are not here merely to teach literacy; we are here to teach people how  to treat each other, and I would think that one of the things we must keep in  mind in the literacy programme which we will work out in the future is that  perspective, and also the fact that illiterates are not necessarily the stupid of  the earth: they may in fact be the ones who are keeping alive certain cultural  values that we may otherwise lose in our rush for more material äevelopment.  Please understand that I am not against literacy. I am merely saying, 'treat  illiterates with respect', and also, 'do not think that we will solve all the  problems of our world and all the problems of Unesco's mandate by achieving  literacy'.
24.7 Nevertheless, I think we have to face the fact that it is a very urgent  and complex issue, and its complexity leads me to say one more thing in relation  to Unesco's action. Literacy is not something that we, as Unesco, or we, as  Member States, particularly the poor Member States, can conquer on our own. It is  what I would call a 'weave' problem. In other words, to conquer it we have to  look at the whole mixture of societies and to conquer it we have to look at the  mixture of instruments that we have at our disposal. It is not something that  Unesco itself can conquer because it may in certain societies be related to  standards of living, standards of sanitation. The fact that children are absent  from school is probably related to the fact that they are carrying bananas, as in  the Caribbean, or that they are carrying water, in some other countries. So I  think that Unesco's action, and its plan of action, must take into account the  need for an inter-agency approach that would bring together experience in health  and in many other areas. It must be a plan which is not merely intersectoral but  is also an inter-agency plan. It has to be built upon the knowledge that what we  are trying to achieve is not merely teaching people to read and write. What we  are aiming at in all our countries is the fulfilment of the potential of  individuals rather than merely providing them with the tools.
24.8 I think, therefore, that we should take up the Director-General's  challenge and use both imagination and determination in building the strategies  for the future. And that imagination, I think (and I think the distinguished  representative from Brazil, in his distinguished address, laid great emphasis  upon this) that strategy must take into account the role that cari be played by  new technologies in giving people the age-old gift of learning to write. Perhaps  we should be experimenting with many other methods: even computers may not be  irrelevant in young or developing societies merely because they do not belong at  present to that cultural milieu; because we must be careful that, in teaching  people to write, we are not maintaining them at the level which is always far  below that of the people who cannot only read and write but also have new  technologies.
24.9 So our literacy efforts must also be a launching pad for launching  people into the possibility of utilizing the full knowledge that is available in  the rest of the world, which will help them to improve their standards of living  and to lead a full life. Therefore I will hope that our plan and our imple-  mentation of the plan will take full account of the possibilities for using new  technologies in creative and imaginative ways for the benefit of illiterates in  poor countries. It may be that we would only use it for data bases; we may use it  for training people in methodologies of teaching literacy; but I do think that we  must be sure that our literacy campaign lays a basis for leaping to a new level  of development.
24.10 Mr President, I have not said too much about the Caribbean, and I don't  even know for how long I have talked, but I think that I have tried to make clear  that the problems that we have experienced in the Caribbean are not different  from those of the rest of the world. We are interested in functional literacy, in  continuing education, and above all in lifelong education. And we also are  interested in joining the technological age and not being left behind by the rush  of industrialization. Thank you very much.
25. The PRESIDENT:  the floor to the distinguished delegate of Mongolia.  I thank the distinguished delegate of Trinidad and Tobago, and I give
26.1 Mr OLZVOY (Mongolia) :  Mr President, Mr Director-General, ladies and gentlemen, it is an honour  and a privilege for me to address this distinguished gathering as a represen-  tative of Asia and the Pacific., the vast and most populated region of the world.
26.2 The subject of this special debate - the eradication of illiteracy - is  one of the urgent and pressing issues .facing the contemporary world today. It  touches upon the fate of almost 900 million illiterates, who are part of mankind  and who also have an inherent right to education. Being able to read and write is  for everyone the pre-condition of his or her personal development, of his or her  full and effective participation in the life of community, of his or her access  to knowledge, to modern skills and to the achievements of science and technology.  Therefore, the promotion of literacy not only involves the process of learning  the skills of reading, writing and arithmetic, but also contributes to the  liberation of man and to his full development.
26.3 Education is acknowledged everywhere to be a fundamental human right as  well as a necessary condition for progress. Illiteracy is most widely spread in  the countries with the least resources and among 'the most destitute sectors of  the population. According to the statistics, 98 per cent of the world's  illiterates live today in developing countries; a majority of them in rural  areas, urban slums and shanty towns. Women are more seriously affected than men,  as &hey constitute 63 per cent of the world's adult illiterates.
26.4 The existence of immense numbers of people who are denied this  fundamental human right and elementary freedom is a grave threat to the progress  and well-being of humanity. Therefore, the struggle against illiteracy should  rightly be considered as a major challenge both for the countries where it exists  and for the international community as a whole. It requires massive, concerted  and continuous activities at national, regional and international levels. We,  therefore, support the proposed plan of action elaborated by the Unesco  Secretariat.
26.5 Mr President, the problem of illiteracy is causing deep concern'in Asia  and the Pacific. It is estimated that 75 per cent of the world's illiterate  population live in this region. It is, therefore, only natural that the nations  of Asia and the Pacific attach great importance to the problem of illiteracy and  support the idea of holding International Literacy Year in 1990.
26.6 Many of them have already achieved considerable success in fighting the  evil of illiteracy. Mongolia is, for instance, a country of almost complete  literacy. Its remarkable progress in eliminating illiteracy has been recognized  by Unesco: the 1972 Nadezhda K. Krupskaya Prize testifies to this. This year two  countries of the region received Unesco's Literacy Prizes: Mrs Eriyah from  Indonesia received the Nadezhda K. Krupskaya Prize and the Noma Prize was awarded  to Thailand's National Literacy Campaign for their notable achievements in the  struggle against illiteracy.
26.7 In February of this year, the Asia-Pacific Programme of Education for  All was launcded in New Delhi, and it has made a good start. National structures  have been set up in a large number of countries and a workshop was recently  organized in Bangkok in order to draw up a regional plan of action, which was  attended by the national co-ordinators of the Programme. It is our firm hope that  implementation of this Programme will bring closer the eradication of illiteracy  in the region.
26.8 Mr President, in yesolution 2.2 adopted at its last session the General  Conference pointed out that 'the problem of illiteracy cannot resolve itself  alone and that in order to eradicate it a worldwide campaign should be organized  and a comprehensive strategy should be formulated to that effect'. And in this  resolution, which was initiated by Mongolia and other co-sponsors, Unesco  appealed to the UN General Assembly to proclaim án International Literacy Year.
26.9 It is gratifying to note that the UN General Assembly responded  positively to this appeal and that 1990 is going to be proclaimed International  Literacy Year. We are of the opinion that 1990 is the most appropriate time for  declaring such a,Year, as it will be the first year of Unesco's third Medium-Term  Plan, and thus it could be the start of a decade of intensive action to free our  planet from the evil of illiteracy by,the year 2000.
26.10 I wish to take this opportunity to express our appreciation to the  Director-General and the Secretariat once again for their great efforts in  preparing an analytical report containing the Plan of Action for the Year which  was unanimously adopted by Commission II.
26.11 We believe that the observance of an International Literacy Year will  be an appropriate occasion for the elaboration of a global plan of action to  eliminate illiteracy by the year 2000. While supporting the objectives of the  International Literacy Year as set forth in the Plan of Action, we merely wish to  stress that national and international efforts should be devoted to: the  promotion of a wider awareness of the scope and magnitude of illiteracy; the  mobilization of world public opinion in favour of the complete eradication of  illiteracy both in the developing and the industrialized countries; the  elaboration of national and international strategies for the eradication of  illiteracy; the creation of favourable international conditions for expanded  co-operation among nations in the field of education and cultural exchange, and  fund-raising (in terms of cash and kind) through voluntary and other sources,  including resources to be released as a result of disarmament measures.
26.12 There is no need, Mr President, to point out that the literacy campaign  should be organized on a planetary basis; and, therefore, that it is the duty of  every State to contribute to a maximum possible extent to the success of the  International Literacy Year. Indeed, the eradication ot illiteracy depends above  all on efforts by national governments. Furthermore, we want all intergovern-  mental and non-governmental organizations to be involved fully within their  mandate in the preparation and observance of the International Literacy Year. In  this connection, my delegation calls upon the Specialized Agencies, regional  commissions and other appropriate bodies of the United Nations system, as well as  the non-governmental organizations, to join Unesco and national governments fully  in their efforts to make the proposed International Literacy Year a success.  Without their participation and commitment International Literacy Year will be  another occasion for disappointment and frustration for millions of illiterates.
26.13 It is also the hope of my delegation that the proposed International  Literacy Year will be followed by an international literacy decade. The culmi-  nation of the International Literacy Year could, in our view, be the convening of  an international forum to proclaim the above-proposed decade and adopt an  international strategy of global efforts to combat illiteracy throughout the  world.
26.14 Today's special meeting of the Unesco General Conference will serve, we  hope, as a starting-point of preparations for the observance of the International  Literacy Year.
26.15 Mr President, the leading organization of the United Nations system in  the field of education, Unesco has always been at the centre of international  efforts aimed at eradicating illiteracy in the world. Considerable etforts have  been made over the past period to support national literacy campaigns, to  organize international conferences, symposia, training courses and to promote the  exchange of experience among Member States. Since 1967, International Lite'racy  Day has been celebrated every year on 8 September, providing an opportunity to  mobilize public opinion and to launch new literacy activities. The awarding of  International Literacy Prizes and the launching of regional programmes for  literacy became important and effective forms of Unesco action aimed at intensi-  fying national efforts in the struggle against illiteracy.
26.16 And it is OUI- belief that Unesco has a duty to be the lead organization  in the preparation and observance of International Literacy Year. We therefore  wish Unesco to strengthen and broaden its activities aimed at eradicating  illiteracy. The literacy campaign should become a priority task in the programme  and budget of Unesco in the years to come, and the Secretariat's branches engaged  in the struggle against illiteracy must be considerably strengthened. We are also  of the opinion that an international co-ordinating body should be established for  the preparation and holding of International Literacy Year.
26.17 Mr President, as you may know, Unesco organized the International  Symposium for the Preparation of International Literacy Year, which was attended  by some eminent experts in literacy and related fields, in Ulan Bator, the  capital city of Mongolia, last May. The Symposium unanimously adopted the  Statement of Ulan Bator, which makes a series of proposals for activities that  could be undertaken by Unesco, Member States , and international governmental and  non-governmental organizations. We hope that the Statement of Ulan Bator will  serve as useful guidance for the successful preparation of International Literacy  Year at national and international levels.
26.18 As prescribed in the Statement of Ulan Bator, Member States and iriter-  national organizations should ensure that their preparatory work is started as  early as possible. We appeal to Member States and international organizations to  establish their National Commissions or task forces now in 1987 with a view to  devoting the next two years to appropriate practical preparations for Inter-  national Literacy Year. There is no time to be lost. As stated in the Statement
743    of Ulan Bator, International Literacy Year should not be a 'celebration' but a  summons to action. May we with your permission, Mr President, express our sincere  hope that International Literacy Year will be crowned with success through joint  efforts at national and international levels. I thank you, Mr President.
27. The PRESIDENT:  the distinguished delegate of India.
28.1 Mr MAHAJAN (India) :  Mr President, distinguished delegates, we are very happy that today's  special debate is devoted to International Literacy Year. As we are aware,  Unesco's interest in literacy goes back to its very inception, and through its  work the Organization has kept the problem of illiteracy visible and in the  forefront. By exhorting Member States to undertake to spread literacy, Unesco has  become the leading world advocate of the great cause over the years. The  Director-General deserves to be congratulated on his report on the preparations  for International Literacy Year and the formulation of a comprehensive strategy  for the eradication of illiteracy, which necessarily should be the essential  ingredient of the third Medium-Term Plan. And it is to be hoped that the Plan of  Action will strengthen our resolve to eradicate illiteracy by the year 2000.  I thank the distinguished delegate of Mongolia, and I give the floor to
28.2 Mr President, there are nearly one billion illiterates in the world -  some countries are predominantly illiterate, others have large segments of people  .-f who cannot read, but practically all have substantial numbers of persons who are  functionally illiterate. This is a world problem. The launching of International  Literacy Year will be a great occasion to focus attention once again on this  disabling handicap - but the efforts will have to go on. We believe what we have  to plan is an international decade for universal literacy.
28.3 The eradication of illiteracy, generally speaking, becomes a part of the  strategy of socio-economic and socio-cultural transformations in countries which  are in the midst of such changes. Very special efforts require to be made in  couritries which are nowhere near universal primary education yet and which suffer  from widespread poverty, malnutrition and underemployment. The international  community and practically all countries have in the past shown a cormitment to  the eradication of illiteracy, but the required measures to achieve this have not  been taken. There is obviously a need for a different kind of strategy. In this  contefi we value the study made by members of the Executive Board which throws up  a host of useful suggestions. Mr President, we also attach importance to the work  done by the Unesco Institute for Education in the field of literacy and post-  literacy, especially its interregional stuüies and research. According to us,  some of the postulates for an effective strategy for literacy should include the  following: (i) securing the- commitment of political leaders and socio-economic  planners, along with the involvement of workers, peasants, youth and voluntary  organizations; (ii) creation of an environment to promote literacy and to give  confidence to the learners and literacy workers and to prevent the cynicism of  the educated dampening their spirits; (iii) effective universalization of primary  education, including non-formal education for children who cannot participate in  whole-time schooling; (iv) provision of post-literacy, continuing education and  non-formal vocational training courses with a view to ensuring the retention of  literacy and its application for their progress; (v) securing the necessary  resources - funds, educational materials, paper and printing presses, etc.;  (vi) sharing of existing expertise and intensive research to improve the pedagogy  of literacy, application to the learning process of traditional as well as modern  communications, harnessing of science and technology to improve the facilities  for literacy learning, and co-ordination with endogenous cultural advancement;  and (vii) co-ordination of literacy and basic education activities with women's  development.
28.4 In India, Mr President, persistent efforts have been maàe to reorganize  the education system, to universalize education and to spread literacy among  youth and adults. While the number of literate persons has increased substan-  tially and the rate of literacy has increased from 16 per cent to 44 per cent  today, the numbers of illiterate persons have also continued to increase.  According to the estimates circulated by the Unesco Secretariat, nearly 30 per  cant of the world's adult illiterates, unfortunately, are in India. Our  government and our people share the concern of the international community about  this high rate of illiteracy in our country. We have made the firm resolution to  face this problem squarely and within a well-defined time frame.
28.5 Mr President, we have recently selected some special thrust areas to  which advances in science and technology would be applied in order that the  fruits of development might reach the most deprived sections of society. These  areas include the provision of drinking water, the immunization of children and  the eradication of illiteracy. The National Literacy Mission has been launched
23  with a view to bringing education to all those in the 15-35 age-group by 1995. In  terms of the percentage of persons to be covered, this may comprise no more than  one third of the total illiterate population of the country; but it is a large  group which is both productive and reproductive and investment in their education  will have a far-reaching impact on my country's development strategy. The  National Literacy Mission will give post-literacy and continuing education the  main focus, utilizing the mass media as well as the print media. All persons in  the 15-35 age-group will be motivated actually to participate in programmes of  literacy and development , made aware of their predicament , their rights as well  as their responsibilities and have inculcated in them certain national values  such as the conservation of the environment, women's equality, social cohesion  and national integration as well as commitment to democratic values and  iristitutions. Our National Literacy Mission will operate up to 1995. Expenditure  on this Mission is expected to be of the order of US $500 million up to 1990 and  approximately three times that amount in the follòwing five years. There is a  determined efrort to pay special attention to women's literacy, to the involve-  ment OZ peoples' organizations such as local bodies, trade unions and youth  organizations, and also the full involvement of voluntary agencies. We have, Sir,  a good record of achievements in the sphere of ìiteracy and adult education, but  also many failures to learn from. The new programme has been prepared after a  great deal of analysis and with the active involvement and participation of the  people to be involved in it.
28.6 Mr President, may I conclude by expressing our fervent hope that  International Literacy Year will mark the beginning of a new decade devoted to  vigorous action for the total eradication of illiteracy from the world. We are  sure that the Director-General will be able to present an imaginative Plan of  Action for International Literacy Year. With all the efforts made by Member  States, the co-ordination of the activities of various international bodies, both  governmental and non-governmental, and the mobilization of resources from all  quarters, we should be able to make real headway towards achieving the goal of  'education for all'. In our view, the efforts of the Unesco Secretariat, its  Regional Offices and specialized institutions should be supported by the  establishment of an intergovernmental co-ordination group which should provi& a  consultative mechanism for advocacy with Member States, co-ordination with other  UN agencies and intergovernmental bodies, the effective involvement of all  non-governmental orgnizations, the raising of resources and the monitoring of  measures initiated for the launching of Intei-riationa1 Literacy Year and the  literacy decade that should follow. I thank you, Mr President.
29.1 The PRESIDENT :  I thank the distinguished delegate of India.
29.2 The meeting is adjourned until 3 o'clock this afternoon.  La séance est levée 5 13 h.15  The meeting rose at 1.15 p.m.  Se levanta la sesión a las 13.15